CHALLENGES  FACING 

HAWAII’S  AIR  SERVICE  MARKET 

S.  HRG.  110–1137 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

APRIL  10,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

74–892 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 10, 2008  ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Prepared  statement  of  Hon.  Neil  Abercrombie,  U.S.  Representative  from 
Hawaii  ............................................................................................................
.
Statement of Senator Smith  ...................................................................................

Prepared statement of Hon. Daniel K. Akaka, U.S. Senator from Hawaii 

WITNESSES 

Banmiller, David A., President and CEO, Aloha Airlines  ....................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Fukunaga,  Barry,  Chief  of  Staff;  Office  of  Governor  Linda  Lingle,  State  of 
Hawaii  ...................................................................................................................
Hirono, Hon. Mazie K., U.S. Representative from Hawaii  ...................................
May,  James  C.,  President  and  CEO,  Air  Transport  Association  of  America, 
Inc.  .........................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Reynolds,  Michael  W.,  Acting  Assistant  Secretary  for  Aviation  and  Inter-
national Affairs, U.S. DOT  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Snowbarger,  Hon.  Vincent  K.,  Deputy  Director  for  Operations,  Pension  Ben-
efit Guaranty Corporation  ...................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Willis  IV,  Charles  F.,  Owner  and  Chairman  of  the  Board,  Island  Air,  Hono-
lulu,  Hawaii;  accompanied  by  Lesley  Kaneshiro,  Chief  Financial  Officer, 
Island Air  ..............................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Daniel K. Inouye to Michael 
W. Reynolds  ..........................................................................................................
...................

Stevens, Hon. Ted, U.S. Senator from Alaska, prepared statement 

APPENDIX 

Page 
1 
1 

6 
5 
8 

20 
25 

34 
3 

30 
32 

9 
10 

17 
18 

28 
30 

49 
49 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

CHALLENGES  FACING 

HAWAII’S  AIR  SERVICE  MARKET 

THURSDAY,  APRIL  10,  2008 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  3:45  p.m.,  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye, 
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The CHAIRMAN. First, my apologies for being late. As you may be 

aware, we have had five consecutive votes that held us up. 

As  an  island  state,  Hawaii  is  uniquely  dependent  on  commercial 
aviation. Our state’s economy requires a vibrant air service to con-
nect  us  within  the  State,  to  the  rest  of  the  Nation,  and  to  the 
world. Not only do our air carriers allow us to move passengers and 
goods  in  an  efficient  and  timely  manner,  they  help  to  unite  us  as 
a  community  and  as  a  people.  Simply  put,  aviation  is  vital  to  our 
lives and our citizens. 

Unfortunately,  the  industry,  and  Hawaii’s  air  carriers  in  par-
ticular,  are  facing  substantial  financial  challenges.  Oil  prices  have 
risen to record levels and ruthless competition in Hawaii’s air serv-
ice market has taken its toll. Last week alone, Hawaii’s own Aloha 
Airlines,  along  with  ATA,  Skybus,  and  Champion,  declared  bank-
ruptcy  and  ended  commercial  passenger  service.  Two  of  these  air-
lines, Aloha and ATA, provided a substantial share of Hawaii’s air 
service. 

Despite  these  challenges,  we  must  ensure  that  the  air  transpor-
tation  system  continues  to  serve  our  state  effectively.  At  the  same 
time, we must understand the impact airline instability has on our 
local communities and the economy. 

Aloha Airlines, for example, has been an important institution in 
Hawaii  for  more  than  60  years.  Aloha  provided  transportation  for 
nearly  4  million  passengers  annually  in  our  State,  with  about  100 
inter-island  flights  daily.  Aloha  also  has  served  as  one  of  Hawaii’s 
largest  employers,  with  more  than  3,500  workers  and  an  annual 
payroll exceeding $100 million. 

Nearly  everyone  who  lives  in  Hawaii  has  flown  Aloha’s  inter-is-
land  flights  for  business  or  to  visit  friends  or  family.  Many  of  us 
know people who work for Aloha. As a matter of fact, I worked for 
TransPacific Airlines for a time early in my career before it became 
Aloha  Airlines.  The  Aloha  workforce  has  served  all  the  citizens  of 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

Hawaii in a very dedicated fashion for a very long time. Now many 
of these employees face uncertain futures, and naturally I am deep-
ly saddened by this unfortunate turn of events. 

At  this  time  it  is  critical  we  take  action  to  support  these  loyal 
Aloha employees. In particular, it is my hope that local lending and 
financial  institutions  will  recognize  the  difficult  position  in  which 
the  employees  find  themselves.  I  call  on  these  institutions  to  con-
sider the unique circumstances of what may well be the largest lay-
off in Hawaii’s history and to provide whatever flexibility they can 
to  customers  in  good  standing.  Providing  temporary  relief  from 
penalties  or  late  fees  is  just  one  way  that  former  Aloha  workers 
may be helped through this difficult time. 

Aggressively  looking  at  the  possibility  of  hiring  segments  of  a 
well-trained workforce is another option I hope many businesses in 
Hawaii will seriously consider. 

On  the  Federal  level,  we  have  been  working  to  ensure  that  the 
modernization  of  the  Nation’s  air  traffic  control  system  results  in 
efficiencies  that  will  increase  safety  and  effectiveness  to  benefit 
both the industry and citizens who depend upon that system. How-
ever,  this  is  clearly  a  long-term  solution  to  some  of  the  problems 
that impact not only Hawaii, but also our Nation’s air carriers. 

In the near term, this Congress must determine what we can do 
at  the  Federal  level  to  help  the  airline  industry  make  it  through 
what  has  become  an  increasingly  difficult  period.  Unfortunately, 
some  solutions  that  have  been  put  forward  may  provide  only  tem-
porary  relief,  as  our  weakening  national  economy  and  high  fuel 
prices threaten to overwhelm any Federal initiatives. 

We  must  also  recognize  that  deregulation  has  dramatically  al-
tered the playing field for our Nation’s air carriers. While deregula-
tion has created substantial benefits for a number of communities, 
others  have  been  less  fortunate  and  do  not  have  the  same  air 
transportation  opportunities  that  were  once  provided.  In  Hawaii, 
these challenges are amplified as we have numerous small commu-
nities in a market that is geographically isolated. 

Finally,  I  would  note  that  new  entrants  into  Hawaii’s  markets 
have made survival impossible for some. Aloha is the most obvious 
example  of  the  impact  of  overly  aggressive  pricing  in  the  market-
place.  Congress  must  deliver  on  the  promise  of  providing  afford-
able,  secure,  and  quality  air  service  to  all  Americans  regardless  of 
geographic  location.  This  is  the  promise  of  deregulation  and  we 
must find a way to deliver on past commitments. 

This  afternoon  we  have  a  panel  of  experts  that  should  help  tell 
us  why  we  came  across  this  problem.  On  this  panel  we  have  the 
Acting  Assistant  Secretary  of  Transportation  for  Aviation  and 
International  Affairs,  Michael  Reynolds;  the  Deputy  Director  for 
Operations,  Pension  Benefit  Guaranty  Corporation,  the  Honorable 
Vince K. Snowbarger; the Chief Executive Officer of Aloha Airlines, 
Mr.  David  Banmiller;  the  Owner  and  Chairman,  Island  Air,  Mr. 
Charles Willis; accompanied by Ms. Lesley Kaneshiro, Chief Finan-
cial Officer of Island Air; the President and Chief Executive Officer 
of  Air  Transport  Association,  Mr.  James  C.  May;  and  the  Chief  of 
Staff of Governor Linda Lingle of Hawaii, Mr. Barry Fukunaga. 

May  I  first  call  upon  our  illustrious  and  distinguished  Member 

of the House, the Honorable Mazie Hirono. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

STATEMENT OF HON. MAZIE K. HIRONO, 

U.S. REPRESENTATIVE FROM HAWAII 

Representative  HIRONO.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  It  is  always 
good  to  see  you.  Senator  Smith.  Thank  you  for  holding  this  impor-
tant  hearing  on  air  service  in  Hawaii  and  for  this  opportunity  for 
me to express my concerns. 

Like  so  many  others  in  Hawaii,  I  was  shocked  to  learn  that 
Aloha  Airlines  was  ending  passenger  operations  after  61  years 
serving our public. Aloha had sought bankruptcy protections in the 
past, as have many other airlines over the years, but to completely 
shut down its passenger service with no resurrection on the horizon 
brought home the precariousness of Hawaii’s situation and her reli-
ance on stable air service. 

My immediate concern, as is yours, is of course for the 2,050 em-
ployees  who  have  lost  their  jobs,  as  well  as  for  the  travelers  who 
have been adversely affected. I know that we will work together to 
provide all available assistance to these workers and their families. 
While  intrastate  air  travel  is  important  throughout  the  United 
States, Hawaii with seven inhabited islands, all of my district, does 
face  some  unique  challenges.  Residents  of  and  visitors  to  Hawaii 
cannot  simply  drive  or  take  a  train  to  another  island.  Hawaii’s 
economy,  which  is  powered  in  large  part  by  our  visitor  industry, 
with  over  7  million  visitors  yearly,  depends  on  reliable  air  pas-
senger  service  between  all  our  islands.  Our  residents,  meanwhile, 
are worried about being able to get inter-island flights for business 
needs  and  to  visit  family  members  on  other  islands.  With  Aloha 
gone  from  the  scene,  this  is  both  an  availability  and  affordability 
issue for our residents. 

The  State  of  Hawaii’s  Department  of  Business,  Economic  Devel-
opment, and Tourism has estimated recently that the Aloha-related 
job  losses  could  push  the  state’s  unemployment  rate  up  almost  a 
full percentage point to 3.8 percent compared to 3.0 percent in Feb-
ruary of 2008. 

We  have  heard  a  number  of  reasons  for  the  failure  of  Aloha,  in-
cluding predatory pricing by a new competitor, high and rapidly in-
creasing  fuel  costs,  and  the  ups  and  downs  of  the  local,  national, 
and international economy. 

Airlines  throughout  the  country  are  struggling  to  deal  with  rap-
idly rising fuel costs. My staff recently met with representatives of 
United  Airlines  who  reported  that  each  increase  of  $1  in  the  price 
of  oil  translates  into  an  increase  of  $60  million  in  expenses  on  an 
annual basis for that airline. United paid an average of $72 a bar-
rel for oil in 2007. Today the price is around $105 per barrel which 
translates to another $1.98 billion in additional fuel costs. 

More  than  20  U.S.  airlines  have  filed  for  Chapter  11  protection 
between  2001  and  2006,  including  four  of  the  six  largest  network 
carriers. How will the industry deal with these higher fuel costs as 
well as with all of the other challenges facing this industry? 

One  factor  that  played  an  important  role  in  driving  Aloha  Air-
lines  again  into  bankruptcy  was  the  fare  war  generated  by  the 
entry  of  Go  Airlines  into  the  Hawaii  market.  Go  offered  air  fares 
as  low  as  $1,  and  its  standard  one-way  inter-island  airfare  was 
about half that charged by Aloha and Hawaiian Airlines. Aloha and 
Hawaiian  felt  compelled  to  match  the  lower  fares.  Aloha  lost  $81 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

million  in  2007  and  $11  million  in  January  2008.  Go  Airlines  lost 
$20 million in its first 16 months of operations in Hawaii. 

4 

I understand that the Department of Transportation has jurisdic-
tion over competition in the airline industry and has the authority 
to  require  that  carriers  refrain  from  unfair  pricing  practices.  I 
would be very interested in Assistant Secretary Reynolds’ views on 
what  role  he  feels  the  DOT  should  play  in  preventing  predatory 
pricing, ruinous competition, or pricing below the cost of service in 
this industry. 

Does  the  DOT  monitor  airline  prices  and  investigate  in  cases 
where  prices  appear  to  be  designed  to  drive  a  competitor  out  of 
business, or does it only react if there is a specific complaint? 

I would be very interested in seeing a survey of pricing practices 
in  the  airline  industry  and  wonder  if  DOT  currently  monitors  and 
evaluates these practices. 

There  is  currently  a  proposal  in  the  Hawaii  State  legislature  to 
establish a regulatory scheme for the regulation of Hawaii inter-is-
land  air  carriers.  While  this  bill  raises  significant  legal  and  Con-
stitutional issues, I certainly understand the desire to exercise con-
trol  over  what  has  been  a  very  unstable  situation  in  Hawaii’s  air-
line industry. 

In  the  context  of  the  ongoing  turmoil  in  the  aviation  industry 
and 25 years of deregulation, one wonders whether increased regu-
lation  at  the  national  level  is  now  warranted.  The  Airline  Deregu-
lation  Act  of  1978  made  substantial  changes  to  the  economic  regu-
latory  environment  of  the  U.S.  commercial  aviation  industry.  The 
Civil  Aeronautics  Board,  CAB,  awarded  a  certificate  of  public  con-
venience  and  necessity  before  an  airline  could  begin  regular  com-
mercial  service.  Airlines  could  not  add  or  abandon  any  route  with-
out  CAB  approval.  The  CAB  set  fares  to  prevent  carriers  from  en-
gaging  in  damaging  price  competition.  In  making  fare  decisions, 
they  determined  what  would  be  fair  for  the  industry.  Competition 
among  airlines  was  based  on  the  number  of  flights  offered  on  the 
various  routes,  as  well  as  amenities  offered,  such  as  free  drinks 
and the quality of meals. Those days are long gone. 

After  deregulation,  airlines  have  to  compete  in  a  completely  dif-
ferent  environment.  Fares  went  down  on  many  of  the  popular 
routes,  but  often  went  up  for  routes  serving  smaller  communities. 
The  primary  form  of  competition  seems  to  have  settled  on  fare 
wars,  which  places  pressure  on  the  airlines  to  reduce  costs  wher-
ever possible. 

In  a  hearing  held  in  the  House  Transportation  and  Infrastruc-
ture Committee last week, we heard of some disturbing failures in 
safety  protocols  by  both  the  airlines  and  the  Federal  Aviation  Ad-
ministration.  I  worry  about  to  what  extent  these  safety  violations 
were  inspired,  at  least  in  part,  by  cost-cutting  considerations.  We 
also  know  that  a  good  deal  of  airline  maintenance  work  is  being 
done in facilities outside of the country. 

Hawaii’s remaining major inter-island carrier, Hawaiian Airlines, 
has moved its reservations operations offshore. Outsourcing of jobs 
is  a  concern  not  only  in  the  airline  industry,  of  course,  but  affects 
many other industries in this global economy. 

Faced  with  the  loss  of  jobs  caused  by  Aloha’s  passenger  oper-
ations,  the  danger  this  closure  brings  to  our  state’s  economy,  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

the  precarious  financial  situation  faced  by  virtually  all  of  our  Na-
tion’s  airlines,  I  am  frustrated  by  the  lack  of  apparent  solutions.  I 
know that some will say that the market will correct the situation, 
but  how  can  we  expect  businesses  to  plan  for  the  tremendous  in-
creases  in  fuel  costs  we  have  faced  in  the  past  year?  How  can  we 
make  sure  that  there  is  fair  competition?  What  can  we  do  to  pro-
tect  the  thousands  of  consumers  who  are  affected  when  an  airline 
like  Aloha  or  ATA  abruptly  stops  flying,  not  to  mention  the  recent 
groundings  of  flights  for  safety  inspections,  including  today  the 
grounding of 900 American Airlines flights? 

The very complex nature of the industry and the high standards 
of  safety  expected  and  required  lead  me  to  question  the  wisdom  of 
leaving  so  much  in  the  airline  industry  to  the  vagaries  of  the  free 
market  system.  I  am  hopeful  that  this  hearing,  as  well  as  others 
to  follow,  will  provide  Congress  with  the  critical  information  nec-
essary  to  take  appropriate  action  to  protect  the  public  and  ensure 
air service in a volatile global market. 

Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  I  thank  you  very  much,  Congresslady.  Your 
statement  is  a  painful  one,  but  very  necessary.  I  appreciate  your 
participation.  And  I  am  sorry  we  had  to  make  you  wait  this  long. 
Representative  HIRONO.  Not  at  all.  It  was  a  pleasure  to  be  able 

to speak to you. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  The  Committee  has  received  two  testimonies 
from Senator Akaka and Congressman Abercrombie. Without objec-
tion, they will be made part of the record. 

[The  prepared  statements  of  Senator  Akaka  and  Representative 

Abercrombie follow:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. AKAKA, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  appreciate  your  conducting  this  hearing  today.  The 
termination  of  Aloha  Airlines’  passenger  service  and  the  subsequent  layoffs  of  em-
ployees deeply saddens me. Aloha Airlines provided essential transportation services 
and employment opportunities in Hawaii for more than 61 years. We must all work 
together  to  assist  employees  who  have  lost  their  jobs  and  to  try  to  preserve  vital 
passenger services. 

As  you  know,  Mr.  Chairman,  the  people  of  Hawaii  are  dependent  on  inter-island 
air travel, which provides residents and visitors with access to commercial opportu-
nities, medical care, and allows them to see their families. Tourism remains a vital 
component of Hawaii’s economy and inter-island flights continue to be important in 
helping visitors enjoy the unique experiences found on each of the islands. 

The loss of 88,000 seats per week for inter-island flights presents a great difficulty 
for island residents. Although the other airlines will add approximately 56,000 seats 
a week, there will still be reduced capacity for inter-island travel. For our residents, 
this could present additional barriers to health care, educational opportunities, and 
economic activity. 

For  Aloha  pilots  and  other  pilots  whose  pensions  have  been  terminated,  my  bill, 
S.  1270,  the  Pension  Benefit  Guaranty  Corporation  (PBGC)  Pilots  Equitable  Treat-
ment Act, could help provide some financial relief. Mr. Chairman, I have greatly ap-
preciated your tremendous support of this legislation. S. 1270 will lower the age re-
quirement  to  receive  the  maximum  pension  benefits  allowed  by  the  PBGC  to  age 
60  for  pilots,  who  were  mandated  by  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration  to  retire 
before  age  65.  Retired  pilots  whose  pensions  are  administered  by  the  PBGC  do  not 
receive  the  maximum  pension  guaranty  because  they  were  forced  to  retire  at  age 
60. My legislation ensures that pilots are able to obtain the maximum PBGC benefit 
without  being  unfairly  penalized  for  having  retired  at  60,  before  the  age  limit  was 
raised  to  age  65.  I  will  continue  to  work  with  you,  the  Health,  Education,  Labor, 
and  Pensions  Committee,  and  other  members  to  bring  about  enactment  of  this  im-
portant legislation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

Thank  you  again  for  conducting  this  hearing,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  look  forward  to 
continuing  to  work  with  you  on  this  vital  issue.  Mahalo  again  for  your  tremendous 
leadership  on  this  issue  and  for  all  of  your  efforts  to  improve  the  lives  of  people  in 
Hawaii. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. NEIL ABERCROMBIE, 

U.S. REPRESENTATIVE FROM HAWAII 

Chairman Inouye and Vice Chairman Ted Stevens, thank you for the opportunity 
to provide testimony before you today. As a member of Hawaii’s Congressional dele-
gation, I am exceptionally concerned with the effects of Aloha Airlines ceasing oper-
ations  in  our  small  island  state  and  the  continuing  reverberations  that  will  be  felt 
for months, and most likely years, to come. 

In  the  days  leading  up  to  Aloha’s  announcement,  I  spoke  with  many  employees 
and officials for Aloha. One thing that particularly struck me was that although the 
airline was struggling in an inter-island market with two major competitors, it was 
sharply  increased  fuel  costs  that  finally  drove  the  airline  to  decide  it  had  to  cease 
operations.  Similar  explanations  have  been  given  by  ATA  which  also  ceased  oper-
ations the same week as Aloha. 

Smaller  airlines  such  as  Aloha,  which  tend  to  serve  geographically  isolated  areas 
like  Hawaii,  are  the  ones  that  will  feel  the  squeeze  from  increased  fuel  costs  first. 
The larger airlines can cut costs by reducing or eliminating partnerships with small-
er  airlines.  Larger  airlines  can  more  easily  absorb  fuel  costs  by  grounding  planes 
and  adding  fuel  surcharges,  which  would  be  smaller  per  person  for  larger  aircraft. 
This  leaves  smaller  airlines  with  higher  ticket  prices  because  of  higher  fuel  sur-
charges and they cannot afford to ground planes. 

As a result, I have written to the President, (please see attached letter) to request 
a temporary release of crude oil from the Strategic Petroleum Reserve for the airline 
and  cargo  shipping  industries.  Although  this  would  be  a  short  term  solution,  I  be-
lieve  that  the  industry  needs  the  relief  now,  because  the  airlines  are  in  an  emer-
gency  situation.  The  bankruptcy  of  Aloha,  ATA  and  Skybus,  almost  in  the  same 
week, have shown the dire state that these small carriers are in. 

In the long term, our country must look toward the future of sustainable domestic 
energy  production  to  ensure  we  are  not  fleeced  by  skyrocketing  imports.  Environ-
mentally sustainable exploration must occur to ensure our domestic supplies remain 
stable and as unaffected as possible by market speculation and international market 
forces for crude oil. 

I  regret  that  these  efforts  occur  too  late  to  assist  Aloha  Airlines.  But  I  hope  they 
will assist other small airlines, particularly those still operating in Hawaii and other 
isolated areas where profit margins are thin and passengers can’t afford to pay more 
for Essential Air Service. In Hawaii, the only way for people who live on the neigh-
bor  islands  to  get  to  hospitals,  VA  hospitals  or  specialty  clinics  in  Honolulu  is  by 
air. This vital and life saving transportation truly is essential service for the people 
of Hawaii. 

The  closure  of  Aloha  Airlines  not  only  limits  transportation  options  among  the 
main islands and to the U.S. mainland, it is affecting our people in Hawaii in their 
daily  lives.  Former  Aloha  Airlines  employees  call  my  office,  not  knowing  how  they 
are going to make their payments on their bills. Financial institutions, have, so far, 
been  unwilling  to  work  with  them.  That  is  why  I  have  written  a  letter  (attached) 
to  the  financial  institutions,  asking  them  to  try  to  work  with  the  now  unemployed 
workers  to  structure  payment  plans  so  that  they  can  afford  to  keep  up  with  their 
bills. 

It  is  my  hope  that  this  hearing  will  provide  more  ideas  for  assisting  the  people 
and  businesses  directly  and  indirectly  affected  by  the  closure  of  one  of  the  oldest 
airline  carriers  in  Hawaii.  These  efforts  will  not  only  assist  Hawaii  but  hopefully 
forestall  future  closures  by  other  airlines  and  ensure  options  for  all  people  who  fly. 
Thank you, Chairman Inouye and Vice Chairman Stevens, for examining this sit-

uation and accepting my testimony today. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

CONGRESS OF THE UNITED STATES, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES 

Washington, DC, April 9, 2008 

Mr. JOHN STUMPF, 
CEO, 
Wells Fargo, 
San Francisco, CA. 
Dear Mr. Stumpf, 

I  am  certain  that  you  aware  of  the  financial  crises  that  have  forced  Aloha  and 
ATA Airlines into bankruptcy, and shattered the lives of thousands of their employ-
ees in Hawaii. Their job loss came very suddenly, and most face the prospect of los-
ing,  not  only  their  livelihoods,  but  their  health  benefits,  after  years  with  their  em-
ployers.  Many  of  these  laid-off  employees  have  contacted  my  office,  some  in  tears, 
asking  for  help  and  not  knowing  what  they  were  going  to  do.  Many  have  contacted 
their  financial  institutions  to  ask  for  payment  extensions  or  some  other  way  of 
working out payment of their bills. But, so far, they report being denied any oppor-
tunity to restructure payments and remain current. 

While  I  understand  that  their  financial  obligations  are  voluntary  contracts  be-
tween  a  company  and  an  individual,  I  am  writing  to  inquire  about  any  flexibility 
that might be offered to these people, who are suddenly unemployed and struggling 
to make ends meet. 

As  our  community  faces  continued  economic  uncertainties,  many  families  in  Ha-
waii  find  themselves  in  difficult  straits.  I  believe  that  such  times  should  bring  out 
the  best  in  all  of  us—individuals  and  businesses.  It  is  important  that  we  all  take 
the time to show each other the understanding and aloha needed to keep our fami-
lies and communities together and out of financial ruin. 

I hope you share my belief, and my commitment to our ohana; to our community. 
I would love to hear from very soon about any assistance you might be able to offer. 

Aloha, 

NEIL ABERCROMBIE, 

Member of Congress. 

CONGRESS OF THE UNITED STATES, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES 

Washington, DC, March 31, 2008 

Hon. GEORGE W. BUSH, 
President of the United States, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Mr. President: 

Right  now—today—our  nation  is  reeling  from  the  impact  of  an  energy  crisis  on 
a  U.S.  economy  already  in  or  on  the  verge  of  recession.  Retail  sales  are  down.  Un-
employment  is  up.  Home  sales  are  down.  Mortgage  foreclosures  are  at  an  historic 
high, and the Federal Reserve intervened last week to keep Wall Street giant Bear 
Stearns front potential catastrophe. 

Add  to  this  the  highest  fuel  prices  in  history,  now  more  than  $110  a  barrel  for 
crude oil and an average price at the pump of more than $3.30 a gallon for regular 
gas, and the impact on a petroleum-fueled economy is devastating. 

I  met  last  weekend  with  officials  of  Aloha  Airlines  in  Honolulu,  trying  to  find  a 
way  for  one  of  Hawaii’s  leading  corporate  citizens,  with  3,400  employees,  to  buy 
time to restructure debt and stay in business. Tragically, Aloha decided late Sunday 
to  halt  61  years  of  air  passenger  service  for  the  people  of  Hawaii.  After  attempting 
to  fight  off  unregulated  predatory  pricing  for  2  years,  a  $71  million  increase  in  the 
cost  of  jet  fuel  pushed  them  over  the  edge.  One  thousand  nine  hundred  people  just 
lost their jobs today. 

Aloha is not alone in being battered by this energy crisis. Other airlines are being 
forced  to  raise  ticket  prices  or  add  as  much  as  a  $50  surcharge  for  fuel.  According 
to the Air Transport Association (ATA), every penny increase in the price of a gallon 
of  jet  fuel  means  $190  million  in  annual  fuel  costs  for  U.S.  Airlines—20  to  30  per-
cent  of  their  total  operating  expense.  As  you  may  be  aware,  ATA  has  today  called 
on  Secretary  of  Energy  Samuel  Bodman  to  authorize  releases  from  the  Nation’s 
home heating oil reserves to help increase the supply of jet fuel. 

The  emergency,  however,  extends  far  beyond  the  airline  industry.  The  effects  of 
soaring  fuel  costs  are  rippling  out  through  the  economy.  Oil  and  refined  products 
fuel  almost  97  percent  of  our  Nation’s  transportation:  automobiles,  trucks,  trains, 
and ships, as well as aircraft. This is how our Nation moves people and goods. 

Fuel cost represents as much as 25 percent of total operating expenses for the Na-
tion’s  motor  carriers,  second  only  to  drivers’  wages.  Transport  companies  and  inde-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

pendent  truckers  across  the  country  are  facing  the  prospect  of  parking  their  trucks 
because  they  simply  cannot  afford  to  buy  diesel  fuel.  One  operator  reported  costs 
of  nearly  $900  to  fill  up  his  rig.  The  impact  of  rising  fuel  costs  on  transport  obvi-
ously means increasing costs for consumer goods. We are already seeing this in food 
prices and retail prices. 

Organizations  like  the  United  States  Postal  Service  and  private  sector  delivery 
companies have no choice but to keep buying fuel for their delivery vehicles, no mat-
ter the cost. And that cost will be passed along to businesses, and ultimately, to con-
sumers. Even as an independent government agency, the Postal Service cannot sus-
tain such devastating cost increases for long without increasing rates. 

Oil and natural gas are raw materials in more than 95 percent of manufacturing: 
plastics, medicines, machinery and all kinds of consumer goods. Energy is the third 
largest manufacturing cost for the forest and paper industry. 

Mr. President, the instability of oil prices will continue to ripple through our econ-

omy. We are, quite clearly, in the midst of an energy emergency. 

I am therefore requesting that you authorize a temporary release of crude oil from 
the  Strategic  Petroleum  Reserve  for  the  airline  and  cargo  shipping  industries.  The 
average  cost  of  crude  in  the  reserve  is  approximately  $27  per  barrel.  If  a  quantity 
of this oil can be released to the market and refined at lower cost than the current 
market-priced  crude,  it  could  generate  a  temporary  supply  of  lower  priced  gasoline, 
diesel  fuel  and  jet  fuel  for  those  industries  that  are  totally  dependent  on  fuel,  and 
on which the U.S. economy is totally dependent. 

Under the Energy Policy and Conservation Act of 1975, draw-downs from the Re-
serve are authorized if the President determines that there is a ‘‘severe energy sup-
ply  interruption;’’  if  that  interruption  has  caused  a  severe  increase  in  the  price  of 
petroleum  products;  and  if  such  prices  are  likely  to  cause  a  major  adverse  impact 
on the national economy. 

This  step  offers  the  prospect  of  temporary  relief,  and  should  not  be  seen  by  any-
one  as  a  long-term  solution  to  the  national  energy  emergency.  But  it  may  serve  as 
an  alarm  to  the  American  public  that  substantial  and  serious  measures  must  be 
taken  immediately  to  prevent  further,  even  permanent,  damage  to  the  U.S.  econ-
omy. It should also be the first substantive action by the Government of the United 
States to address the energy and economic crisis. 

Mr. President, I believe those conditions which allow for a release from the Stra-

tegic Petroleum Reserve now exist, and I urgently request prompt action. 

Aloha, 

NEIL ABERCROMBIE, 

Member of Congress. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  must  apologize.  I  did  not  notice  the  presence 
of  Senator  Smith  here.  If  I  had  known  that,  I  would  have  called 
on you earlier. Please forgive me, sir. I am now privileged to intro-
duce Senator Smith of Oregon. 

STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator  SMITH.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  am  here  with  no  agenda  other 
than  an  affection  for  Hawaii.  I  have  been  a  regular  user  of  Aloha, 
and  every  time  I  travel  the  6  hours  to  Oregon,  I  think  of  my  col-
league, the Chairman, who has another 6 hours to go. 

I  regard  Hawaii  as  a  very  treasured  place  and  I  am  anxious  to 
learn  what  has  happened  because  I  am  anxious  to  find  ways  that 
I,  who  often  advocate  for  routes  to  Oregon—how  we  can  improve 
this system and make sure that Essential Air Service is there. 

I am old enough to remember that when I used to get on an air-
plane,  there  used  to  be  a  lot  of  empty  seats.  I  am  mindful  that 
there are many planes that are now grounded simply to make sure 
that  every  seat  is  filled  in  order  to  afford  the  fuel  costs.  If  there 
was  a  silver  bullet  on  fuel  costs,  we  would  shoot  it.  We  would  fire 
it. We would fix it. There is not. 

In the meantime, we have got to make sure that remote places— 
and  I  come  from  a  remote  part  of  Oregon—have  the  ability  to  ac-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

cess  essential  infrastructure  like  airlines.  Obviously,  the  Hawaiian 
Islands—you either get there by slow boat or by Aloha, Hawaii, or 
Go. ATA I guess has gone out as well. 

And  I  am  anxious  to  be  here  just  to  learn,  to  offer  constructive 
insights,  and  to  ask  some  questions.  So  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  If  I  may,  on  behalf  of  the  people  of  Hawaii,  I 
thank you for your presence here. It is most comforting. Thank you. 
And  it  is  now  my  pleasure  to  call  upon  the  Assistant  Secretary 
of  Transportation  for  Aviation  and  International  Affairs,  the  Hon-
orable Michael Reynolds. 

Will the others take their places? 

STATEMENT  OF  MICHAEL  W.  REYNOLDS,  ACTING  ASSISTANT 
SECRETARY  FOR  AVIATION  AND  INTERNATIONAL  AFFAIRS, 
U.S. DOT 
Mr. REYNOLDS. Chairman Inouye, Senator Smith, with your per-
mission,  I  would  like  to  summarize  my  written  statement  which  I 
ask be made part of the record. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Your  full  statement  will  be  made  part  of  the 

record. 

Mr. REYNOLDS. Thank you for the opportunity to appear today to 
discuss challenges facing Hawaii’s air service market. I can assure 
you  that  the  Department  is  keenly  aware  of  the  unique  role  that 
air  transportation  plays  in  the  State  of  Hawaii  and  that  air  trans-
portation to and within Hawaii continues to be an important issue, 
particularly in light of the recent cessation of passenger services by 
Aloha Airlines and ATA Airlines. 

Nonetheless, many of the challenges faced by the airline industry 
in  Hawaii  are  similar  to  those  facing  all  our  airlines.  In  that  re-
gard,  the  outlook  for  the  U.S.  airline  industry  as  a  whole  is  hazy, 
despite  a  return  to  profitability  in  the  last  2  years.  Many  carriers 
have cut costs and become more efficient in recent years only to see 
those gains offset by record fuel prices. 

The industry faces major challenges in 2008: the high fuel prices 
that  we  are  all  well  aware  of,  a  potentially  weaker  economy,  and 
labor  cost  pressures.  These  factors  can  severely  affect  airlines  and 
the  demand  for  air  travel,  particularly  in  discretionary  markets 
such as Hawaii, which I now turn to. 

As  you  know  well,  the  six  major  islands  depend  heavily  on  air 
service.  Aloha  and  Hawaiian  Airlines  have  traditionally  provided 
the  bulk  of  the  inter-island  air  service.  In  May  2006,  Mesa’s  Go 
commenced  service,  and  from  that  time  until  very  recently,  there 
were  three  high  frequency  jet  operators  in  the  market.  Of  course, 
smaller  carriers  such  as  Island  Air  and  Pacific  Wings  also  provide 
service and make up approximately 8 percent of the inter-island ca-
pacity. 

The  entry  of  Go  came  at  a  time  when  other  structural  economic 
developments exerted downward pressure on the demand for inter- 
island  travel.  For  example,  as  the  other  islands  have  become  more 
economically  developed,  the  need  for  local  residents  to  travel  to 
Honolulu  from  the  other  islands  for  goods  and  services  has  de-
creased.  In  addition,  since  2000,  airlines  have  tripled  their  service 
from  the  mainland  directly  to  the  Big  Island,  Maui,  and  Kauai, 
which means fewer travelers require inter-island connections. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

Also, Hawaii’s critical international and domestic tourism market 
segments have been stagnant or declining over the past few years. 
In  2007,  7.4  million  visitors  arrived  by  air,  which  was  a  1  percent 
decrease from 2006. 

Clearly, sustaining three carriers in the main inter-island routes 
proved  difficult.  But  even  before  Go  entered  the  market,  Hawaiian 
and Aloha had been in bankruptcy in the last few years. 

Now, let me briefly discuss the recent airline shutdowns. 
While  the  loss  of  Aloha  and  ATA  Airlines  has  reduced  capacity 
between Hawaii and the mainland by about 14 percent, it is impor-
tant to note that there are still eight airlines providing various lev-
els of service, including United, Hawaiian, American, Delta, North-
west,  US  Airways,  Continental,  and  Alaska,  most  of  which  have 
added capacity to the market since Aloha and ATA ceased services. 
In addition, Hawaiian and Go are adding aircraft capacity to the 
inter-island market, and several carriers have been offering special 
deals for passengers affected by the shutdowns. 

Nonetheless,  based  on  our  internal  analysis,  as  many  as  9,000 
Hawaii  passengers  have  had  travel  plans  disrupted  by  the  sudden 
termination of air service by both Aloha and ATA. 

On the positive side, most of these passengers are expected to be 
accommodated. Clearly, some passengers encountered more serious 
inconvenience  and  delays,  especially  in  markets  without  alternate 
nonstop service. Because more than 90 percent of these passengers 
used  credit  cards  to  purchase  their  air  travel,  they  should  be  able 
to  recover  from  the  credit  card  companies  payments  for  any  air 
transportation services that were not provided. 

Finally,  I  want  to  touch  on  the  issue  of  service  to  more  remote 
points in Hawaii. The Department’s Essential Air Service Program 
provides  a  safety  net  to  ensure  that  eligible  communities  receive 
continuous, uninterrupted air service. After several years of receiv-
ing  subsidized  air  service,  last  April  the  communities  of  Hana, 
Kalaupapa,  and  Kamuela  began  receiving  air  service  without  sub-
sidy.  I  wish  to  point  out  that  even  though  the  communities  no 
longer  receive  subsidized  EAS,  they  are  all  still  protected  against 
losing service under the program. 

That  concludes  my  oral  statement.  I  would  be  happy  to  answer 

any questions you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Reynolds follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MICHAEL W. REYNOLDS, ACTING ASSISTANT SECRETARY 

FOR AVIATION AND INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS, U.S. DOT 

Chairman Inouye and Members of the Committee: 

Introduction 

Thank you for the opportunity to appear before you to discuss ‘‘Challenges Facing 
Hawaii’s Air Service Market.’’ While there certainly are unique needs and character-
istics  in  the  Hawaii  market,  many  of  the  challenges  faced  by  the  airline  industry 
in  Hawaii  are  similar  to  those  facing  our  airlines  in  all  markets,  domestic  and  for-
eign. 
State of the Airline Industry 

Let me begin with the state of the airline industry. The U.S. airline industry has 
been emerging from a major restructuring precipitated by a fundamental change in 
passenger  demand  that  began  in  the  first  half  of  this  decade.  Some  large  carriers 
have  successfully  restructured  and  adapted  their  business  models,  while  other  car-
riers have been slower to do so. Record fuel prices have offset the benefits that some 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

carriers  gained  through  cost  reductions  and  other  efficiencies  achieved  in  restruc-
turing, in and out of bankruptcy. 

Despite fuel price increases, the industry as a whole was profitable for 2007, with 
net  income  of  $3.8  billion  in  2007  versus  $1.7  billion  in  2006.  Going  forward  how-
ever,  the  outlook  for  airlines  is  hazy.  The  industry  faces  major  challenges  in  2008: 
high fuel prices, a potentially weaker economy, and labor cost pressures. These fac-
tors  can  severely  affect  demand  for  travel,  particularly  in  discretionary  markets, 
such as Hawaii. 

Clearly  the  major  challenge  remains  record  high  fuel  prices,  with  crude  oil  hov-
ering around $100 per barrel. Fuel cost is now the largest single cost center for the 
airlines. A one cent per gallon increase in the price of jet fuel costs the U.S. airline 
industry an additional $16 million per month more for fuel on a system basis. This 
may  not  seem  like  much,  but  when  you  consider  the  drastic  change  in  the  price  of 
crude oil and its distillate, jet kerosene, over the last 3 years, the cost to the airlines 
becomes much more palpable. Between 2004 and 2007, jet fuel rose from an average 
of  86  cents  per  gallon  to  an  average  of  $2.12  per  gallon  in  2007,  non-inflation  ad-
justed.  This  is  a  248  percent  increase  in  the  cost  per  gallon  of  jet  fuel.  According 
to  JPMorgan’s  analysis,  every  $10  increase  in  a  barrel  of  oil  requires  $18  in  addi-
tional air fare on average just to maintain a steady state. While the industry posted 
an operating loss of approximately $87 million in the fourth quarter 2007, it would 
have  posted  an  operating  profit  of  $1.35  billion  in  that  quarter  of  2007  had  fuel 
prices remained at fourth quarter 2006 levels. Soaring fuel prices have masked the 
tremendous  progress  legacy  carriers  have  made  in  reducing  their  costs  to  levels 
more  competitive  with  low-cost/low-fare  carriers  and  eclipsed  gains  that  could  have 
been used to fund essential long-term capital expenditures. Future fuel price uncer-
tainty will continue to motivate industry-wide cost and capacity discipline. 

There are other challenges facing the industry, including labor cost pressures and 
pressures from institutional investors to ‘‘unlock’’ shareholder value. As these other 
challenges are beyond the scope of this hearing, I will not elaborate on them today. 
Nature of the Hawaiian Aviation Market 

Next,  I  would  like  to  summarize  briefly  the  nature  of  the  Hawaiian  air  service 

market. 

Hawaii,  of  course,  has  six  major  islands  that  depend  heavily  on  air  service,  and 
inter-island  markets  have  been  extremely  competitive.  While  Aloha  and  Hawaiian 
Airlines  have  traditionally  provided  the  bulk  of  inter-island  air  service,  over  the 
years there have been many smaller players that have entered and exited the mar-
ket.  In  May  2006,  Mesa’s  Go  service  commenced,  and  from  that  time  until  very  re-
cently,  the  inter-island  market  has  been  served  by  three  high-frequency  jet  opera-
tors.  Other  smaller  carriers  like  Island  Air  and  Pacific  Wings  also  provide  service 
and  make  up  approximately  8  percent  of  the  inter-island  capacity.  There  are  also 
a number of air taxis that compete for traffic in these markets. 

Historically,  average  fares  for  local  travel  in  the  inter-island  markets  have  been 
quite low, averaging less than $50 in the 3-year period 2000 through 2002 for each 
inter-island  city-pair  market.  Beginning  in  2001,  average  fares  began  a  gradual  in-
crease  in  all  inter-island  markets,  and  more  so  in  the  smaller  ones,  until  the  De-
partment  granted  Aloha  and  Hawaiian  antitrust  immunity  for  a  capacity  coopera-
tion  agreement  that  was  permitted  under  a  special  provision  in  the  2001  Aviation 
and Transportation Security Act. Shortly after the carriers implemented their capac-
ity coordination agreement in 2002–2003, they discontinued the coupon distribution 
system  for  inter-island  travel  and  implemented  different  pricing  structures.  Fares 
for  both  carriers  rose  significantly  during  the  period  in  which  capacity  cooperation 
agreement was in effect. In 2005, Hawaiian’s inter-island fares were about 7 percent 
higher  across  the  board  than  Aloha’s.  In  2007,  however,  average  fares  for  both  car-
riers were about equal. 

In  general,  average  fares  in  the  inter-island  markets  have  been  lower  than  aver-
age fares in markets of comparable distance and density (the number of people trav-
eling  in  the  market)  in  the  continental  United  States,  including  markets  served  by 
low-fare  carriers  such  as  Southwest,  JetBlue,  and  AirTran.  For  example,  the  Hono-
lulu-Kona market at a distance of 163 miles had an average fare at the end of third 
quarter 2007 of $50. By comparison, Southwest’s fare in comparable markets ranged 
between $80 and $111. In the Kona-Lihue market, the average fare was $81, where-
as  average  fares  for  Southwest  in  markets  of  comparable  distance  ranged  from  $91 
to $116. 

Prior  to  Go’s  entry  in  the  market  in  2006,  the  number  of  flights  and  capacity  of-
fered  in  the  inter-island  markets  had  been  slightly  declining.  A  large  decrease  in 
service  occurred  right  after  September  11,  2001  and  did  not  start  to  rebound  until 
the third quarter of 2004. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

After  Go’s  entry  into  Hawaii  and  before  Aloha’s  cessation  of  service,  inter-island 
fares fell 27 percent to levels not seen since 2000, a time when fuel was one-quarter 
the  price  and  inter-island  passenger  traffic  was  nearly  14  percent  greater  (capacity 
was 29 percent higher). Load factors on inter-island services have averaged between 
65 percent and 70 percent prior to Aloha’s shutdown. 

The  entry  of  Go  into  the  inter-island  markets  came  at  a  time  when  other  struc-
tural  economic  developments  exerted  downward  pressure  on  the  demand  for  inter- 
island  travel.  First,  as  the  other  islands  became  more  economically  developed,  the 
need for local residents to travel to Honolulu (Oahu) from the other islands for goods 
and  services  decreased.  In  addition,  since  2000,  carriers  have  tripled  their  service 
from the mainland directly to the Big Island, Maui, and Kauai, which means fewer 
travelers  require  inter-island  connections.  For  example,  the  nearly  two  million  visi-
tors  to  Hawaii  from  California  now  have  direct  links  from  their  state  to  Kahului, 
Kona, Hilo, and Lihue. 

Second,  Hawaii’s  critical  international  and  domestic  tourism  market  segments 
have been stagnant or declining over the past few years. In 2007, 7.4 million visitors 
arrived by air—a 1 percent decrease from 2006. The biggest decline was a 5-percent 
decrease  by  non-U.S.  visitors  to  Hawaii.  Approximately  70  percent  of  non-U.S.  visi-
tors come from Japan, a country whose economy continues to stagnate. Also, emerg-
ing  tourist  markets  in  Asia  have  exacerbated  the  situation  as  many  Japanese  are 
vacationing  closer  to  home.  In  the  future,  tourists  from  China  could  replace  those 
from Japan as rising incomes and a booming economy enable more Chinese citizens 
to travel. The Department has been aggressively seeking to liberalize the restrictive 
Chinese  bilateral  air  services  agreement  to  increase  the  numbers  of  flights  per-
mitted  between  the  U.S.  and  China.  One  bright  spot  is  Canada.  While  Canada  ac-
counts  for  just  4  percent  of  all  visitors  to  Hawaii,  the  number  of  Canadian  visitors 
to  Hawaii  rose  over  5  percent  between  2006  and  2007.  Meanwhile,  the  number  of 
U.S. visitors to Hawaii has remained flat. Importantly, however, the figure for visi-
tors  from  California,  who  make  up  25  percent  of  Hawaii’s  tourist  market,  fell  more 
than  3  percent  in  2007.  This  is  partially  explained  by  the  downturn  in  the  housing 
market,  which  has  hit  California  particularly  hard.  In  short,  fewer  tourists  mean 
fewer inter-island trips. 

As  indicated  above,  unlike  the  inter-island  markets,  many  other  airlines  offer 
service  between  the  West  Coast  and  one  or  more  of  the  Hawaiian  Islands.  While 
the  loss  of  Aloha  and  ATA  Airlines  has  reduced  capacity  between  Hawaii  and  the 
mainland  (including  Alaska)  by  about  14  percent,  there  are  still  eight  airlines  pro-
viding various levels of service including United, Hawaiian, American, Delta, North-
west, US Airways, Continental, and Alaska. 

This  market  overview  clearly  shows  that  the  large,  inter-island  markets  have 
been highly competitive and the most negatively impacted by structural changes in 
tourist  and  traffic  flows.  Record  high  fuel  prices  have  exacerbated  the  situation. 
From  time  to  time,  there  has  been  entry  by  a  third  carrier  focusing  on  inter-island 
traffic  (Mid-Pacific  and  Discovery  in  the  1980s,  Mahalo  Air  in  the  1990s,  and  Go 
in  this  decade)  in  Hawaii.  Sustaining  three  major  carriers  operating  service  on  the 
main  inter-island  trunk  routes  has  proven  difficult.  According  to  press  reports,  Go 
has  lost  as  much  as  $20  million  since  it  began  service  on  these  routes  2  years  ago. 
In  part  as  a  result  of  the  substantial  structural  changes  in  the  aviation  markets 
to/from and within Hawaii over the past decade, both Aloha and Hawaiian have ex-
perienced financial difficulties. In the past few years, the carriers have held merger 
discussions,  but  the  two  management  teams  and  their  various  owners  have  never 
been  able  to  agree  on  how  to  blend  the  two  airlines.  Furthermore,  Hawaiian  was 
in  bankruptcy  from  2003  to  2005,  and  Aloha  was  in  bankruptcy  from  2004  to  2006 
prior to going in again last month. 
Role of Government 

Having outlined the challenges facing the airline industry in general and the Ha-
waiian markets in particular, I would like to discuss the appropriate role of govern-
ment  in  the  industry’s  ongoing  restructuring.  By  deregulating  the  airline  industry 
in 1978, Congress set the Department permanently on the path away from interven-
tion  in  the  air  transportation  marketplace.  Many,  including  the  Department  of 
Transportation,  have  a  long-held  view  that  deregulation  has  been  a  success,  pro-
ducing  an  abundance  of  service  with  low  fares—at  the  same  time  the  industry  has 
achieved a spectacular safety record. Indeed, the fundamental restructuring that we 
have observed over the last 6 years is largely the result of market forces that were 
set in motion prior to the September 11th terrorist attacks. The architects of airline 
deregulation  predicted  that  new,  innovative  airlines  would  enter  the  marketplace, 
establish a significant and sustained market share, and exert competitive discipline 
on  incumbent  firms  and  ensure  that  savings  from  efficiencies  were  passed  along  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

consumers.  That  is  precisely  what  happened;  though  it  happened  differently  and 
somewhat  later  than  expected.  With  respect  to  aviation,  deregulation  has  become 
the default policy around the world. 
Airline Industry Restructuring 

Since  the  passage  of  the  Airline  Deregulation  Act  in  1978,  which  opened  our  do-
mestic  air  services  to  the  free  market,  Congress  recognized  that  the  risk  of  airline 
failures was possible. Deregulation stimulated air travel, lowered air fares, and cre-
ated  a  highly  competitive,  efficient,  and  viable  air  transportation  system  in  the 
United States. Yet, it is an industry fraught with risks—an industry sensitive to an 
unstable  economic  environment,  jet  fuel  prices,  and  cyclic  swings  in  the  economy. 
The public has benefited from competition provided by new entrant carriers who ac-
quired the aircraft of bankrupt airlines and implemented a new business model with 
low  fares  to  attract  customers.  In  fact,  over  the  past  30  years,  we  have  seen  many 
air  carrier  failures.  In  an  uncertain  economic  environment  and  with  record  jet  fuel 
prices,  it  is  not  shocking  that  air  carriers—which  depend  so  heavily  on  fuel—are 
having difficulty surviving in today’s price competitive aviation environment. 

The  Government  Accountability  Office  in  a  September  2005  Report  to  Congress 
said  that  bankruptcy  ‘‘is  endemic  to  the  airline  industry  owing  to  long-standing 
structural  challenges  and  weak  financial  performance  in  the  industry.’’  Indeed, 
bankruptcies  in  the  airline  industry  are  not  uncommon.  Since  airline  deregulation 
30 years ago, there have been more than 170 airline bankruptcies, averaging almost 
six a year. 

During the last 2 weeks, three airlines have filed or expect to file for bankruptcy 
protection.  Aloha  Airlines,  ATA  Airlines,  and  Skybus  Airlines  have  shut  down  and 
stopped  passenger  air  services.  They  attributed  their  business  failure  to  rising  fuel 
costs  and  a  slowing  economy.  These  carriers  could  not  make  a  business  case  to  at-
tract more capital in the current economic environment. 

In  this  context,  let  me  briefly  outline  the  recent  situations  at  Aloha  Airlines  and 

ATA Airlines. 
Immediate  Impact  of  Aloha’s  and  ATA’s  Cessation  of  Scheduled  Passenger 

Service 

In  order  to  assess  the  ability  of  other  carriers  to  assist  stranded  Aloha  and  ATA 
passengers  based  on  existing  schedules,  we  reviewed  available  services  of  U.S.  and 
foreign  carriers  that  compete  with  Aloha  and/or  ATA  on  their  inter-island  routes 
and  between  Hawaii  and  the  U.S.  mainland.  During  April,  we  estimate  that  just 
over  90,000  passengers  will  travel  to/from  Hawaii  or  about  3,000  per  day.  There  is 
competitive  service  on  many  of  the  Aloha  and  ATA  routes  between  the  Mainland 
and  Hawaii.  Based  on  our  internal  analysis,  as  many  as  9,000  Hawaii  passengers 
were  inconvenienced  by  the  sudden  termination  of  air  service  by  both  Aloha  and 
ATA.  This  figure  does  not  take  into  account  the  additional  seat  capacity  that  was 
added  to  the  Hawaii  market  by  competing  carriers  in  response  to  the  Aloha  and 
ATA shutdowns. 

Despite the high load factors experienced by competing carriers in these markets, 
most  Aloha  and  ATA  passengers  were  expected  to  be  accommodated,  perhaps  some 
taking  circuitous  and  multi-stop  routings.  Clearly,  some  passengers  encountered 
more  serious  inconvenience  and  delays,  especially  in  the  three  markets  without  al-
ternate nonstop service, namely Oakland-Lihue; Las Vegas-Maui; and Oakland-Hilo. 
Aloha  informed  the  Department  that,  on  the  day  it  stopped  service,  about  700 
Aloha  strandees  would  need  transportation  to  or  from  the  mainland,  and  steadily 
decreasing  numbers  of  such  passengers  would  need  to  be  accommodated  each  day 
through April 12. 

American,  United,  Delta,  Continental,  US  Airways,  Hawaiian,  and  Go  added  air-
craft  capacity  to  the  market,  to  help  minimize  the  impact  on  Aloha’s  stranded  pas-
sengers.  Hawaiian  and  Go  carried  Aloha’s  inter-island  passengers  on  a  standby 
basis  for  free  for  the  first  4  days  after  Aloha’s  shutdown  and  on  a  confirmed  basis 
for $49 through April 7. 

Alaska Airlines recently announced plans for new daily service to Hawaii from Se-

attle and seasonal service from Anchorage. 
Federal Government’s Efforts To Address the Situation in Hawaii 

There are no requirements for other airlines to accept the tickets of an air carrier 
that ceases operations. However, when an airline shuts down the Department moves 
immediately  to  contact  other  carriers  providing  service  on  those  routes  to  ascertain 
their policies with respect to carriage of the passengers of the failed airline, to make 
it  clear  that  consumer  harm  should  be  minimized,  and  to  make  information  about 
the  airline  policies  readily  available  to  consumers.  We  then  distribute  information 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

to affected consumers about their options. This is accomplished via our website and 
in responses to telephone and other inquiries. 

When  the  Department  learned  of  the  Aloha  and  ATA  shutdowns,  my  office  and 
the Department’s aviation consumer office gathered information from these two car-
riers  via  teleconferences  and  e-mail.  The  aviation  consumer  office  then  contacted 
other airlines serving the affected markets and posted information and advice on its 
website for affected consumers. In general, this involves information about alternate 
transportation,  claiming  a  refund  from  the  consumer’s  credit  card  company  under 
the  Fair  Credit  Billing  Act,  and  filing  a  claim  for  a  cash  refund  or  baggage  claim 
settlement in any bankruptcy proceeding that may take place. 

Other  carriers  appear  to  recognize  that  voluntarily  providing  affected  passengers 
reasonable options for alternate transportation is in their interest. Carriers are mo-
tivated to do this as a competitive initiative, in part as a market-development strat-
egy  to  attract  business  travelers  and  frequent  flyers.  For  example,  in  connection 
with the recent shutdown of ATA Airlines, most major carriers are or were offering 
affected  passengers  standby  transportation  for  $100  per  non-stop  segment  and/or 
waiving  their  own  advance  purchase  requirements  on  discount  fares.  In  the  case  of 
Aloha Airlines, Hawaiian Airlines and Go were offering free standby seats to Aloha 
passengers  for  the  first  4  days  after  the  Aloha  shutdown  (i.e.,  through  April  3). 
Through  April  7,  Hawaiian  was  offering  a  special  $49  fare  for  inter-island  flights. 
Hawaiian  also  immediately  added  6,000  seats  per  day  to  its  schedule.  United  Air-
lines is offering special discounts to Aloha’s Hawaii-mainland passengers, on a con-
firmed basis, through April 30. 

In  the  case  of  both  ATA  and  Aloha,  as  required  by  contract  and  by  DOT  policy, 
their codeshare partners are honoring tickets issued in that partner’s name by pro-
viding  transportation  on  a  confirmed  basis  with  no  additional  fare  collection  where 
possible.  Where  that  is  not  possible,  those  codeshare  partners  are  providing  a  full 
refund. 

Both  carriers  indicated  that  well  over  90  percent  of  their  passengers  used  credit 
cards  to  purchase  air  travel.  Those  passengers  should  be  able  to  recover  from  the 
credit  card  companies  payments  for  any  air  transportation  services  that  were  not 
provided. 
Essential Air Service Implications 

We have also examined Aloha’s shutdown in the context of the Essential Air Serv-
ice  program  and  find  that  there  are  no  issues.  All  five  communities  that  Aloha 
served—Hilo, Kona, Kauai, Kahului, and Honolulu—are served by at least two other 
carriers, Hawaiian and Go. No market will be without service. The smallest market 
in terms of service (Hilo-Honolulu) has at least 13 non-stop round trips per day. 

Also in the context of EAS, the Department is fully aware of Hawaii’s dependence 
on  air  service,  and  the  EAS  program  provides  a  safety  net  to  ensure  that  eligible 
communities  receive  continuous,  uninterrupted  air  service.  Up  until  April  1,  2007, 
the  communities  of  Hana,  Kalaupapa  and  Kamuela  had  received  subsidized  service 
under the EAS program for about 6 years. As the end of the then-current EAS con-
tract  was  nearing,  the  incumbent  carrier,  Pacific  Wings,  announced  that  it  would 
continue  to  serve  all  three  communities,  but  without  the  need  for  further  Federal 
subsidy.  I  wish  to  point  out  that,  even  though  the  communities  no  longer  receive 
subsidized  EAS,  they  are  all  still  protected  against  losing  service.  That  is,  even  if 
the incumbent carrier wanted to suspend service, it would first have to file a notice 
of  intent  to  suspend  service  and  we  would  hold  the  carrier’s  service  in  place  while 
we sought and procured replacement service. 

Thank you, and I would be pleased to take any questions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

ATTACHMENT: 5 CHARTS 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.

2
N
Y
E
R
0
1
4

s
p
e
.
1
N
Y
E
R
0
1
4

16 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.

4
N
Y
E
R
0
1
4

s
p
e
.
3
N
Y
E
R
0
1
4

17 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Mr. Reynolds. 
Now  may  I  call  upon  the  Deputy  Director  of  Operations  of  the 
Pension  Benefit  Guaranty  Corporation,  the  Honorable  Vincent 
Snowbarger? 

STATEMENT  OF  HON.  VINCENT  K.  SNOWBARGER,  DEPUTY 
DIRECTOR FOR OPERATIONS, PENSION BENEFIT GUARANTY 
CORPORATION 
Mr.  SNOWBARGER.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Inouye  and  Senator 
Smith. My name is Vince Snowbarger, and I am the Deputy Direc-
tor  of  Operations  at  the  Pension  Benefit  Guaranty  Corporation, 
otherwise known as PBGC. 

ERISA,  the  Employee  Retirement  Income  Security  Act  of  1974, 
created  PBGC  to  guarantee  pensions  when  underfunded  defined 
pension plans like Aloha’s are terminated. 

We want to thank you for the opportunity to appear today before 
the Committee to discuss the challenges facing Hawaii’s air service 
market.  My  remarks  will  focus  on  matters  impacting  the  partici-
pants  and  beneficiaries  in  the  four  defined  benefit  pension  plans 
sponsored  by  Aloha  Airlines.  Aloha  employees  may  have  other  re-
tirement plans that PBGC does not insure. 

In  December  2004,  Aloha  filed  for  bankruptcy.  As  a  part  of  the 
settlement  reached  in  February  of  2006,  PBGC  assumed  responsi-
bility  for  the  pensions  of  nearly  4,000  workers  and  retirees  who 
were  participants  in  three  of  the  four  defined  benefit  plans  at 
Aloha.  It  was  the  plan  for  non-unionized  employees,  the  plan  for 
employees  represented  by  International  Association  of  Machinists, 
and  the  pilots’  plan.  In  that  agreement,  Aloha  agreed  to  maintain 
a fourth plan for its dispatchers. 

In  the  three  plans  that  were  terminated,  we  estimate  that  the 
plans had $177 million in assets to cover $346 million in promised 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
5
N
Y
E
R
0
1
4

18 

benefits.  That  means  the  plans  were  only  51  percent  funded  with 
$169 million in total underfunding. PBGC will be able to guaranty 
about  $119  million  of  that  underfunding,  but  participants  will  lose 
about  $50  million  in  promised  benefits  that  PBGC  cannot  pay 
under Federal law. 

My written testimony provides more information on each of these 

plans. 

PBGC is currently paying estimated benefits to these Aloha retir-
ees.  We  are  in  the  process  of  making  final  benefit  determinations 
for  the  Aloha  plans.  It  is  a  complex  process  that  takes  about  3 
years normally. PBGC expects to send final benefit determinations 
to Aloha participants next year. 

On  March  20,  Aloha  again  filed  for  bankruptcy.  The  airline  has 
one  plan  remaining  subject  to  PBGC  jurisdiction.  The  plan  for 
Aloha’s dispatchers covers about 50 participants. It is underfunded 
by  about  $1  million.  As  the  current  bankruptcy  case  develops,  we 
will  continue  to  work  with  Aloha,  its  creditors,  and  the  court  to 
protect the benefits of those participants. 

As  I  mentioned  earlier,  there  are  other  benefits  that  PBGC  does 
not  insure,  including  health  benefits.  However,  participants  who 
are  aged  55  or  older  and  who  receive  PBGC  benefits  may  be  eligi-
ble  for  the  Health  Coverage  Tax  Credit.  I  have  provided  informa-
tion  in  my  written  testimony  for  the  HCTC  customer  contact  cen-
ter. It is a program operated in conjunction with the IRS. 

PBGC is always available to help participants. We let them know 
when  they  are  eligible  to  apply  for  benefits,  and  we  provide  them 
with  any  help  they  need  in  completing  applications.  They  can  also 
access our website at www.pbgc.gov, and there they can request an 
estimate  of  benefits,  apply  for  benefits,  set  up  or  change  Federal 
tax  withholding,  and  so  forth.  There  are  also  pages  on  the  website 
for each of Aloha’s terminated plans. We keep participants updated 
through  newsletters  and  our  website,  and  they  can  also  call  our 
customer contact center at 1–800–400–7242. 

PBGC  is  committed  to  paying  all  workers  and  retirees  the  bene-
fits they are entitled to under law, and we try to make our benefit 
determination  process  as  efficient  and  customer-friendly  as  pos-
sible.  I  want  to  assure  you  that  we  will  continue  to  carry  out  our 
mission  to  pay  benefits  to  participants,  including  the  Aloha  work-
ers. 

And  I  want  to  thank  you  again  for  the  opportunity  to  appear 

today, and I would be pleased to answer any questions. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Snowbarger follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. VINCENT K. SNOWBARGER, DEPUTY DIRECTOR FOR 

OPERATIONS, PENSION BENEFIT GUARANTY CORPORATION 

Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  Members  of  the  Committee,  my  name 
is  Vince  Snowbarger  and  I  am  the  Deputy  Director  for  Operations  at  the  Pension 
Benefit Guaranty Corporation (‘‘PBGC’’ or ‘‘the Corporation’’). 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  the  Committee  today  to  discuss 
the  challenges  facing  Hawaii’s  air  service  market.  My  testimony  will  focus  on  mat-
ters  impacting  the  4,000  participants  and  beneficiaries  in  the  three  defined  benefit 
pension  plans  sponsored  by  Aloha  Airlines  that  were  assumed  by  PBGC  in  April 
2006  following  the  carrier’s  emergence  from  an  earlier  bankruptcy.  A  fourth  plan 
sponsored by Aloha for its dispatchers, covering about 50 participants, remained on-
going after the bankruptcy. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Pension Benefit Administration 

19 

PBGC  was  created  by  the  Employee  Retirement  Income  Security  Act  of  1974 
(‘‘ERISA’’)  to  guarantee  pensions  when  an  underfunded  defined  benefit  plan  is  ter-
minated. When PBGC assumes an underfunded plan, the Corporation pays benefits 
up  to  ERISA  guarantee  limits.  For  insured  plans  that  terminated  in  2005  such  as 
Aloha’s,  the  maximum  guaranteed  benefit  is  $45,613  per  year  ($3,801  monthly)  for 
PBGC payments beginning at age 65. The maximum is actuarially adjusted for ben-
efits  beginning  earlier  or  later,  or  if  a  benefit  will  be  payable  to  a  surviving  bene-
ficiary. 

When PBGC becomes trustee of a plan, retirees initially receive the same monthly 
benefit amounts that the plan was paying. Once PBGC obtains plan data and makes 
a preliminary analysis, benefit payments are reduced if necessary to an estimate of 
the  amount  payable  under  Federal  law.  We  also  inform  participants  that  any  over-
payments  will  be  subject  to  recoupment  (the  process  by  which  participants  return 
any overpayments). 

In  order  to  make  final  benefit  determinations,  PBGC  applies  various  statutory 

provisions that include: 

• calculating the benefit under the specific plan provisions; 
• applying the statutory maximum guarantee; 
• phasing  in  the  guarantee  of  benefit  increases  within  5  years  of  plan  termi-
• allocating plan assets and recoveries from employers available to pay non-guar-

nation; and 

anteed benefits. 

Because plan provisions and the statutory rules noted above are complex, it takes 
about  3  years  to  complete  final  benefit  determinations.  When  this  process  is  fin-
ished,  PBGC  sends  a  letter  to  each  participant  explaining  the  calculations  and  the 
changes, if any, in their estimated benefit amount. Participants have 45 days to ap-
peal this final determination. 

At  every  step  in  the  process,  the  Corporation  is  available  to  answer  participants’ 
questions and to help them apply for benefits. For larger plans, PBGC holds partici-
pant  meetings  to  provide  both  general  and  plan-specific  information  about  the  ter-
mination process. We also send an annual newsletter to participants receiving bene-
fits  and  semiannual  newsletters  to  those  not  yet  retired.  Participants  can  get  addi-
tional 
insurance  program  at 
www.pbgc.gov  or  by  calling  PBGC’s  Customer  Contact  Center  at  1–800–400–7242. 
Airline Pensions 

information  about  PBGC  and 

the  pension 

Airline  plans  have  accounted  for  more  than  $14  billion  in  claims  since  1974—ap-
proximately  40  percent  of  all  claims  from  failed  companies.  Since  2001,  PBGC  has 
assumed responsibility for the pension plans of TWA, US Airways, United Airlines, 
and  the  pilots  of  Delta  Air  Lines.  In  addition,  as  of  the  end  of  calendar  year  2006, 
there  was  another  $12.6  billion  in  unfunded  pension  liabilities  in  ongoing  defined 
benefit plans in the airline industry. 
Aloha Airlines 

On December 30, 2004, Aloha Airlines filed for bankruptcy. PBGC tried to compel 
Aloha  to  keep  its  plans  ongoing.  However,  as  part  of  the  bankruptcy  settlement 
reached  in  February  2006,  the  Corporation  was  appointed  trustee  for  the  pensions 
of  nearly  4,000  workers  and  retirees  who  were  participants  in  three  of  Aloha’s  de-
fined  benefit  plans:  the  Pension  Plan  for  Non-Represented  Employees,  the  Pension 
Plan  for  Employees  Represented  by  the  International  Association  of  Machinists 
(IAM),  and  the  Pilots’  Fixed  Retirement  Plan.  A  fourth  plan,  the  Pension  Plan  for 
Dispatchers, survived the bankruptcy. 

The termination date for the three trusteed plans was December 14, 2005. PBGC’s 
most recent estimate is that the three plans on an aggregate basis were 51 percent 
funded  with  $177  million  in  assets  to  cover  $346  million  in  promised  benefits.  Of 
the  $169  million  in  total  underfunding,  about  $119  million  was  guaranteed.  Plan 
participants  thus  will  lose  about  $50  million  in  unfunded,  non-guaranteed  benefits 
that cannot be paid under Federal law. 

PBGC has sent estimated benefit statements to participants in the three trusteed 
plans.  As  specified  below,  more  than  90  percent  of  participants  in  the  Non-Rep-
resented Employees Plan and the IAM Employees Plan continue to receive their full 
benefit  payment;  the  remaining  participants  in  these  two  plans  are  now  receiving 
reduced  benefits  as  determined  by  statutory  limits.  In  the  Pilots’  Fixed  Retirement 
Plan, about 58 percent of participants are now receiving reduced benefits, primarily 
due to the previously-noted maximum guaranteed benefit under ERISA ($45,613 for 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

plans  that  terminated  in  2005).  Participants  in  all  three  plans  should  expect  to  re-
ceive final benefit determination letters in 2009. 
Non-Represented Employees Plan 

The  plan  for  non-represented  employees  covers  about  900  participants.  The  plan 
was 39 percent funded, with $21 million in assets to cover $54 million in liabilities. 
However,  about  840  of  those  participants  (93  percent)  are  receiving  their  full  bene-
fits and are not affected by ERISA guarantee limits. The remaining 60 participants 
(7 percent) have had their benefits reduced by an average of about $170 per month 
(a 21 percent reduction). These reductions were required because salary concessions 
reduced the wages on which benefits are based. 
IAM Employees Plan 

The  Aloha  IAM  plan  covers  about  2,600  participants.  The  plan  was  58  percent 
funded, with $87 million in assets to cover $151 million in liabilities. However, like 
the  non-represented  employees,  about  2,350  IAM  participants  (90  percent)  are  re-
ceiving  their  full  plan  benefits.  The  remaining  250  participants  (10  percent)  have 
had  small  reductions  in  their  benefits  averaging  about  $33  per  month  (a  3  percent 
reduction).  These  reductions  were  primarily  the  result  of  the  phase-in  limit  on  re-
cent  benefit  increases  under  ERISA;  generally,  this  five-year  formula  guarantees 
benefit increases at 20 percent for each year in effect. 
Pilots’ Fixed Retirement Plan 

The  pilots’  plan  covers  about  450  participants.  The  plan  was  49  percent  funded, 
with $69 million in assets to cover $141 million in liabilities. About 190 participants 
(42  percent)  are  receiving  their  full  plan  benefits.  The  remaining  260  participants 
(58 percent) have had their benefits reduced primarily due to the maximum guaran-
teed  benefit  under  ERISA  that  imposes  an  annual  dollar  cap  (again,  $45,613  for 
2005  plan  terminations).  The  average  benefit  reduction  for  these  participants  is 
about $1,050 per month (a 42 percent reduction). However, based on the most recent 
information  available,  the  assets  in  the  plan  will  be  sufficient  so  that  those  Aloha 
pilots who were retired (or were eligible to retire 3 years prior to plan termination) 
are expected to receive about 60 percent of their promised benefits. 
Dispatchers’ Plan 

As  noted,  Aloha  currently  sponsors  one  ongoing  defined  benefit  plan  for  dis-
patchers covering about 50 participants, and which PBGC estimates as being under-
funded by about $1 million. As Aloha’s current bankruptcy plan develops, PBGC will 
take  appropriate  steps  to  ensure  that  none  of  the  plan’s  participants  is  put  at  risk. 
Health Care 

An  issue  that  often  arises  in  conjunction  with  business  failures  is  the  loss  of  em-
ployer-provided  health  care  coverage  for  workers  and  retirees.  By  law,  PBGC  guar-
antees do not cover health insurance. However, certain PBGC benefit recipients who 
are  age  55  or  older  and  are  covered  by  qualified  health  insurance  are  eligible  for 
the  Health  Coverage  Tax  Credit  (HCTC).  For  more  information,  participants  can 
call the HCTC Customer Contact Center at 1–866–628–HCTC (4282). 
Conclusion 

PBGC  is  committed  to  paying  all  workers  and  retirees  the  full  benefit  amounts 
they are entitled to under law, and we are making every effort to make the benefit 
determination process as efficient and customer-service oriented as possible. I want 
to assure you and the participants in all defined benefit plans insured by PBGC that 
the Corporation stands ready to carry out its mission to pay benefits to participants, 
as  it  is  now  doing  for  Aloha  participants  and  as  it  has  done  since  the  enactment 
of  ERISA.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  here  today,  and  I  would  be 
pleased to answer any questions you may have. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Mr. Director. 
And now may I call upon the Chief Executive Officer of the Aloha 

Airlines, David Banmiller? Mr. Banmiller? 

STATEMENT OF DAVID A. BANMILLER, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

ALOHA AIRLINES 

Mr. BANMILLER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, Senator Smith. Good 

afternoon and aloha. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

Today is a very sad time for Aloha Airlines, for the State of Ha-

waii, and indeed, the entire airline industry. 

See, what we do touches everyone’s lives in this country. Airlines 
drive  local  economies.  They  provide  employment  directly  and  indi-
rectly,  and  they  speed  travelers  on  their  way  to  make  business 
deals, go on holiday, attend weddings, and enjoy the benefits of an 
open economy. 

How things have changed in our industry. 
My  humble  beginnings  in  commercial  aviation  came  as  a  man-
agement trainee with one of the great airlines of U.S. aviation his-
tory, TWA. About 40 years ago, I was on the front lines as a ticket 
agent. Thanks to TWA I learned a lot about customer service from 
the  ground  up,  writing  tickets  and  handling  baggage.  The  ticket 
counters next to me belonged to another giant of the industry that 
seemed equally invincible at the time, Eastern Air Lines. They are 
both  long  gone,  along  with  Pan  Am  and  other  pioneering  airlines. 
Today  America’s  airlines  are  more  challenged  than  they  have 
ever been. When it comes to airlines, change is constant. Or as the 
authors  of  Over  the  Hedge  put  it,  ‘‘The  more  things  change,  the 
more they remain insane.’’ 

What once was a proud industry that lured lifetime employment 
of  dedicated  workers  who  strived  to  exude  exceptional  customer 
service  and  focused  on  taking  care  of  their  traveling  patrons  has 
now become an industry filled with chaos and uncertainty. 

The Airline Deregulation Act of 1978 opened the playing field for 
competition. At the outset, deregulation was supposed to yield posi-
tive  outcomes,  especially  for  the  large  hub  markets.  But  for  the 
smaller  regional  markets  like  Hawaii,  deregulation  has  proved  to 
be  potentially  harmful  in  achieving  stability  in  air  transportation 
service. 

For  example,  since  the  Deregulation  Act,  Hawaii  has  witnessed 
the collapse of a number of airlines, including Mid Pacific, Mahalo, 
and Discovery, as well as two bankruptcy filings for Hawaiian Air-
lines and Aloha Airlines. 

Why?  Because  deregulation  only  opened  up  the  revenue  side  of 
the  business.  It  did  not  touch  the  cost  side.  And  despite  deregula-
tion  some  30  years  ago,  the  industry  continues  to  be  one  of  the 
most heavily taxed and regulated of industries in this country. 

Today I will focus on the unfortunate situation of Aloha, a main-
stay  of  Hawaii’s  tourism-dependent  economy  for  more  than  60 
years.  I  plan  to  share  with  you  the  challenges  we  faced  and  the 
cause of our passenger service shutdown. 

The  two  main  factors  that  caused  the  company  to  cease  its  his-
toric  passenger  business  were  unfair  competition  and  the  soaring 
cost of jet fuel. The latter continues to pose a real threat to the air 
transportation  industry,  both  in  the  United  States  and  around  the 
world. 

I  also  want  to  touch  upon  a  few  global  trends  that  continue  to 
threaten Hawaii because of its geographic isolation and its depend-
ence  on  air  transportation  more  than  any  other  State  in  this  Na-
tion. 

What  you  are  seeing  today  with  the  recent  collapse  of  Aloha’s 
passenger  business,  along  with  the  shutdown  of  ATA,  Skybus, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

Champion,  and  MAXjet  before  that,  is  just  the  tip  of  the  iceberg. 
Industry observers are asking who is next. 

The  cost  of  fuel  continues  to  rise  with  wild  abandon,  unchecked 
by government even as oil companies reap enormous profits. When 
I  was  at  TWA  in  the  1960s,  fuel  represented  5  percent  of  an  air-
line’s costs. Today it is 45 percent and currently surpasses labor as 
the number one expense for most airlines. 

Throughout  the  1990s,  the  average  cost  of  a  barrel  of  crude  was 
under $20. By 2004, it was $40. Now it is $111 a barrel. Inconceiv-
able even a year ago, and every $1 costs about $400 million to our 
industry in this country. 

Aloha  shares  with  our  industry  colleagues  in  calling  for  swift 
Federal action on a 21st century air traffic control system upgrade 
to  make  air  transportation  more  efficient  by  eliminating  the  ar-
chaic  ground-tracking  systems  which  makes  for  longer  than  nec-
essary routing and landing patterns. We strongly believe that if our 
air  traffic  control  system  were  upgraded  to  satellite  tracking,  we 
could be saving a lot of fuel. 

Our  fear  is  that  without  major  strides  toward  modernizing  ATC 
and  spreading  the  cost  burden  to  all  the  users,  states  like  Hawaii 
that  are  solely  dependent  on  air  transportation  stand  to  lose  more 
vital  air  service.  And  keep  in  mind,  the  average  American  suffers 
as a consequence of what happens to airlines. 

Now,  the  public  has  become  accustomed  to  think  that  it  is  nor-
mal  for  airlines  to  go  into  and  out  of  bankruptcy.  But  it  does  not 
always  work  out  that  way.  In  our  first  bankruptcy,  cutting  costs 
was  job  number  one.  With  our  self-help  program,  we  involved  the 
dedicated  employees  of  our  company  and  cut  across  the  board,  in-
cluding  20  percent  salary  cuts.  Working  24/7,  we  were  able  to  put 
that complicated process together, frankly with the support and co-
operation  of  the  fine  employees  of  our  company  and  their  labor 
leaders. We also paid back the Federal ATSB loan in full. 

At  the  same  time,  we  forestalled  demands  from  aircraft  lessors 
to take our airplanes and we skated around onerous covenants and 
found permanent financing. I thought it was hard to find investors 
back then. Little did I know then what I know now. 

Emerging  from  our  first  bankruptcy,  we  were  optimistic  that  we 
had  a  viable  plan,  one  that  could  bring  profit,  even  in  the  tough 
inter-island  market.  In  September  2005,  we  signed  an  agreement 
with  the  Yucaipa  Companies,  a  well-respected  private  equity  firm, 
for a substantial equity infusion, $98 million, including $63 million 
in equity and $35 million in debt financing. 

On  the  very  day  that  Aloha  signed  the  new  investment  agree-
ment  came  the  announcement  that  Mesa  Air  group,  an  Arizona 
company,  planned  to  compete  in  the  inter-island  market  with  its 
own  low-cost  carrier.  We  believe  this  improper  because  Mesa  had 
come to Aloha as a potential investor and Mesa had also looked at 
Hawaiian’s  books  while  they  were  in  bankruptcy.  It  is  pretty  clear 
to  us  that  the  timing  of  Mesa’s  announcement  was  intended  to 
scare off investment in Aloha, something it did not do. 

Mesa  launched  Go  Airlines  in  June  2006  with  an  advertised  in-
troductory  fare  of  $39.  In  its  first  18  months  of  operation,  those 
fares went from $39 to $29, $19, $9, and $1. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

A study done for Aloha by Sabre Airline Solutions soon after they 
entered  the  market  indicated  that  with  a  62  percent  load  factor, 
which  was  roughly  what  Go  was  operating  at,  they  needed  $67  a 
ticket minimum—now with fuel it is over $70—versus $50 a ticket 
to  break  even  for  Aloha  and  $55  for  Hawaiian.  We  at  Aloha  Air-
lines were, in fact, the low-cost per-seat operator in the islands. 

So  we  began  asking  people  in  government,  business,  and  the 
media,  just  about  anyone  that  would  listen  to  us  these  questions. 
Why would Mesa charge less for a seat than it costs to produce it? 
Why  would  Go  start  at  $39  and  go  all  the  way  down  to  $9  and  $1 
when it cost $70 to fly a seat? Why would any manufacturer or pro-
vider of services do such a thing for 2 years? 

Now,  everybody  loves  a  bargain,  particularly  in  air  fares,  but 
even  so,  Mesa’s  strategy  of  below-cost  pricing  raised  eyebrows. 
Even  bargain  lovers  began  to  ask,  why  is  somebody  not  doing 
something about this? 

Well, you know, we did not sit by idly. We spoke to elected Fed-
eral,  State,  and  county  officials  and  every  editorial  board  that 
would listen to us. We came to Washington to ask the Department 
of  Transportation  and  the  Department  of  Justice  to  look  into 
Mesa’s predatory practices in Hawaii and to do something about it. 
We spoke to various lawmakers on the Hill. 

Everyone  told  me  that  predatory  pricing  is  hard  to  prove.  I  be-
lieve  that  if  there  is  ever  textbook  definition  of  predatory  pricing, 
this is it. 

Not  one,  but  both  of  Hawaii’s  legacy  inter-island  carriers  have 

In  February,  Hawaiian  filed  a  lawsuit  asserting  claims  against 
Mesa  for  breach  of  a  nondisclosure  agreement  that  Mesa  had  exe-
cuted. 

In  January  2007,  Aloha  filed  suit  against  Mesa  alleging  misuse 
of  confidential  information  and  deliberately  sought  to  drive  Aloha 
out of business in violation of Federal antitrust laws. In fact, court 
documents  show  that  Mesa’s  chief  financial  officer  stated  in  an  e- 
mail that rather than wait for Aloha to die, Mesa should enter the 
inter-island market and give Aloha the last push. 

Due to this pending litigation, I prefer not to go into any further 

detail on that matter. 

sued Mesa. 

Now,  in  spite  of  the  legal  challenges,  Mesa  continues  to  operate 

in Hawaii at $49 inter-island fares. 

For  the  year  2007,  Aloha  lost  $81  million  on  revenues  of  $407 
million,  and  in  January  2008  alone,  we  lost  $10.6  million  on  $34 
million in revenue. 

In  March  of  this  year,  after  2  years  of  escalating  fuel  prices  and 
cutthroat  competition,  Aloha’s  lead  investor  opted  to  stop  funding 
Aloha  Airlines  after  they  had  put  in  another  $100  million.  This 
came on the day that we noted fuel prices at $111 a barrel. 

Faced  with  that  reality,  we  worked  round-the-clock  in  search  of 
a new investor, including other airlines. We felt that a strategic in-
vestor, an airline, might be interested, but we found out they have 
their  own  problems,  as  you  know.  And  with  fuel  rising  the  way  it 
was and an inter-island fare war, there was no one there. 

Our  senior  management,  our  owners,  and  the  board  anguished 
over  that  decision  to  terminate  passenger  service  and  did  so  only 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

after  our  lenders  could  not  provide  any  further  funding  and  after 
all other alternatives were exhausted. 

No one wanted to believe that a passenger airline with a 62-year 
history of serving Hawaii could disappear or that 2,000 of our peo-
ple  who  supported  passenger  operations  could  lose  their  jobs  over-
night. Without any further financing, we had to make the hard de-
cision. 

We  are  continuing  round-the-clock  efforts  to  save  our  cargo  and 
contract services operation in order to preserve more than 1,000 re-
maining jobs. We also hold out hope that investors will look at res-
urrecting Aloha’s entire passenger operation in the future. 

What  impact  does  this  have  on  Hawaii?  Aloha  Airlines  was  the 
state’s  10th  largest  private  employer.  We  offered  frequent,  reliable 
passenger  service,  100  inter-island  flights  a  day,  linking  Hawaii’s 
four  counties  and  key  cities.  We  flew  4  million  passengers  a  year, 
including  1  million  visitors  and  residents  between  Hawaii  and  the 
West  Coast.  We  served  the  largest  tourism  markets  in  southern 
California  and  had  the  most  non-stops  from  the  West  Coast  to 
Maui. 

We  supported  hundreds  of  nonprofit  organizations  throughout 
the  State.  For  example,  in  2006,  we  spearheaded  the  annual  fund- 
raiser for the March of Dimes and raised over $500,000. 

Cargo and contract services continue to operate, pending the sale 
of  those  business  units,  and  they  remain  a  vital  part  of  the  air 
transport system in Hawaii. 

Aloha  also  holds  the  majority  of  U.S.  contracts  with  Hawaii  for 
the  mail  and  carries  about  85  percent  of  perishable,  sensitive  con-
sumer goods. 

We  also  continue  to  provide  passenger  and  maintenance  service 

for a number of other carriers in the market. 

Following  the  shutdown  of  Aloha’s  service  to  five  Hawaiian  and 
six  Mainland  destinations,  ATA  shut  down.  At  this  point  in  time, 
there is no daily nonstop service out of Orange County or Oakland 
to any of the cities in Hawaii. And 20 aircraft have been pulled out 
of Hawaiian service on the West Coast, and we were offering about 
15 percent of the traffic at that time between the two carriers. 

State  tourism  officials  are  expressing  concern  that  Hawaii  does 
not  have  enough  seats  in  key  visitor  markets  and  that  the  loss  of 
airlift could cost the state up to half a million visitors a year. Ana-
lysts  say  the  average  fare  from  the  mainland  to  Hawaii  could  rise 
by  $200  round  trip,  and  inter-island  fares,  I  can  assure  you,  will 
go up to pre-Mesa levels, if not higher. 

To date, we have terminated more than 2,000 employees and es-
timate the cost to the State of Hawaii in unemployment of over $50 
million. 

This  company  was  started  in  1946  and  the  men  and  women  of 
our  company  were  involved  in  many  community  affairs  and  sup-
ported  so  much  beyond  just  air  travel  itself.  Aloha’s  employees 
were  not  just  good  people  like  you  will  find  throughout  the  airline 
industry.  They  were  warm,  wonderful  people  who  shared  a  unique 
spirit of compassion and care for customers and coworkers. We call 
it the Aloha Spirit. 

I could say more about them, but let me show you this. 
[Video shown.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

Mr. BANMILLER. As a testament to these fine people, let me share 
with  you  the  DOT’s  most  recent  air  travel  consumer  report,  which 
just  came  out.  Since  it  began  monthly  reporting  last  April,  Aloha 
has  consistently  been  one  of  the  Nation’s  best  airlines  in  punc-
tuality, baggage delivery, fewest cancellations, and fewest customer 
complaints.  Last  week’s  DOT  report  placed  Aloha  as  the  number 
one  carrier  in  on-time  performance  and  fewest  passenger  com-
plaints. 

There may be other airlines serving Hawaii, but there will never 

be another like Aloha Airlines. 

Thank you, sir. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Banmiller follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID A. BANMILLER, 

PRESIDENT AND CEO, ALOHA AIRLINES 

Mr. Chairman, Vice Chairman, Members: 
Good afternoon and aloha! 
This  is  a  very  sad  time  for  Aloha  Airlines  and  indeed  the  entire  airline  industry. 
What  we  do  touches  everyone’s  lives  in  this  country.  Airlines  drive  local  econo-
mies,  they  provide  employment  directly  and  indirectly;  and  they  speed  travelers  on 
their way to make business deals, go on holiday, attend weddings and enjoy the ben-
efits of an open economy. 

How things have changed in our industry! 
My  humble  beginnings  in  commercial  aviation  came  as  a  management  trainee 

with one of the great airlines of U.S. aviation history: TWA. 

About  40  years  ago,  I  was  on  the  front  lines  as  a  ticket  agent.  Thanks  to  TWA, 
I learned a lot about customer service from the ground up, writing tickets by hand, 
and handling baggage. 

By  the  way,  the  next  ticket  counters  over  from  ours  belonged  to  another  giant  of 
the  airline  industry  that  seemed  equally  invincible  at  the  time—Eastern  Air  Lines. 
They’re both long-gone, along with Pan-Am and other pioneering airlines. 

Today  America’s  airlines  are  more  challenged  than  they  have  ever  been.  When  it 
comes  to  airlines,  change  is  the  constant.  Or  as  the  authors  of  ‘‘Over  the  Hedge’’ 
put it: ‘‘the more things change, the more they remain insane.’’ 

What  once  was  a  proud  industry  that  lured  lifetime  employment  of  dedicated 
workers,  who  strived  to  exude  exceptional  customer  service,  and  focused  on  taking 
care  of  their  traveling  patrons,  has  now  become  an  industry  filled  with  chaos  and 
uncertainty. 

The  Airline  Deregulation  Act  of  1978  opened  the  playing  field  of  competition.  At 
the  outset,  deregulation  was  supposed  to  yield  positive  outcomes  especially  for  the 
large hub markets. But for smaller regional markets, like Hawaii, deregulation has 
proved to be potentially harmful in achieving stable air transportation service. 

For  example,  since  the  Deregulation  Act,  Hawaii  has  witnessed  the  collapse  of  a 
number  of  airlines  including  Mid  Pacific,  Mahalo  and  Discovery,  as  well  as  two 
bankruptcy  filings  by  Hawaiian  Airlines  and  two  bankruptcy  filings  by  Aloha  Air-
lines. 

Why?  Because  deregulation  only  regulated  the  revenue  side  of  the  business,  not 
the  cost  side.  And  despite  deregulation  30  years  ago,  the  airline  industry  continues 
to be one of the most heavily regulated and taxed businesses in America. 

Today  I  will  focus  on  the  unfortunate  situation  at  Aloha  Airlines,  a  mainstay  of 

Hawaii’s tourism-dependent economy for more than 60 years. 

I plan to share with you the challenges we faced and the cause of our passenger- 

service shutdown. 

The  two  main  factors  that  caused  the  company  to  cease  its  historic  passenger 
business  were  unfair  competition  and  the  soaring  cost  of  jet  fuel.  The  latter  con-
tinues  to  pose  a  real  threat  to  the  air  transportation  industry,  both  in  the  United 
States and around the world. 

I  also  want  to  touch  upon  a  few  global  trends  that  continue  to  threaten  Hawaii 
because  of  its  geographic  isolation  and  its  dependence  on  air  transportation  more 
than any other state in the Nation. 

What you’re seeing today with the recent closure of Aloha’s passenger business— 
along  with  the  shutdown  of  ATA  Airlines,  Skybus,  Champion,  and  MAXjet  airways 
before that—is just the tip of the iceberg. Industry observers are asking, who’s next? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Fuel Costs 

26 

The  cost  of  fuel  continues  to  rise  with  wild  abandon,  unchecked  by  government 

even as oil companies reap enormous profits. 

When I was at TWA in the Sixties, fuel represented 5 percent of an airline’s costs. 
Today  it’s  45  percent  and  currently  surpasses  labor  as  the  number  one  expense  for 
most airlines. 

Throughout  the  1990s,  the  average  cost  of  a  barrel  of  crude  was  under  $20.  In 
the  year  2004,  it  rose  to  $40.  Earlier  this  year,  oil  sold  for  $111  a  barrel,  a  price 
that was inconceivable even a year ago. For every $1 increase in the price of crude, 
the  cost  of  jet  fuel  to  the  airline  industry  is  in  excess  of  $400  million  a  year.  And, 
unfortunately, there is no such thing as a hybrid jet. 

Aloha has joined our industry colleagues in the Air Transport Association in call-
ing  for  swift  Federal  action  on  a  21st  century  air  traffic  control  system  upgrade  to 
make  air  transportation  more  efficient  by  eliminating  America’s  archaic  ground- 
tracking  system,  which  makes  for  longer  than  necessary  routing  and  landing  pat-
terns. 

We  strongly  believe  that  if  our  air  traffic  control  system  were  upgraded  to  sat-

ellite-tracking, we could be saving a lot more fuel. 

Our fear is that without major strides toward modernizing ATC and spreading the 
cost burden to all users of the system, states like Hawaii that are solely dependent 
on  air  transportation,  stand  to  lose  more  vital  air  service.  And  keep  in  mind,  the 
average American suffers as a consequence of what happens to airlines. 
Bankruptcy 

The  public  has  become  accustomed  to  think  that  it  is  normal  for  airlines  to  go 

into and out of bankruptcy. But it doesn’t always work out that way. 

In our first bankruptcy, cutting costs was job number one. Our self-help program 
involved  a  lot  of  dedicated  people,  especially  Aloha’s  employees  across  the  board— 
who wound up taking a 20-percent pay cut. 

Working  24/7  and  across  six  time  zones,  we  brought  Aloha  out  of  a  complicated 
bankruptcy in a little more than 1 year. In order to succeed, we worked hard to win 
the  confidence  and  support  of  Aloha’s  unionized  labor  groups  and  saved  thousands 
of jobs while maintaining the company’s reputation for exceptional customer service. 

We also paid our Federal ATSB loan in full and on time. 
At  the  same  time,  we  forestalled  demands  from  aircraft  lessors  who  threatened 
to  pull  back  Aloha’s  aircraft.  We  secured  interim  DIP  financing  at  a  cost,  and  we 
skated  around  onerous  covenants  while  seeking  permanent  financing  to  take  the 
company  forward.  I  thought  it  was  hard  to  find  investors  back  then.  Little  did  I 
know then what I know now. 

Emerging  from  our  first  bankruptcy,  we  were  optimistic  that  we  had  a  viable 
business  plan,  one  that  could  bring  profits  even  in  the  traditionally  low-fare  inter- 
island market. 
Mesa Air Group 

Back on September 22, 2005, we had signed an agreement with the Yucaipa Com-
panies,  a  well-respected  private  equity  fund,  for  a  substantial  equity  investment  in 
Aloha.  The  $98  million  agreement  included  $63  million  in  equity  and  $35  million 
in debt financing. 

However, on the very same day that Aloha signed the new investment agreement 
came  the  announcement  that  Mesa  Air  group,  an  Arizona,  company,  planned  to 
compete in the inter-island market with its own low-cost carrier. 

We believe this improper because Mesa had come to Aloha as a potential investor 
and  Mesa  had  also  looked  at  Hawaiian’s  books  when  they  were  in  bankruptcy.  It 
was  pretty  clear  to  us  that  the  timing  of  Mesa’s  announcement  was  intended  to 
scare off investment in Aloha, something it did not do. 

Mesa launched its inter-island carrier go! Airlines on June 9, 2006, with an adver-
tised  introductory  fare  of  $39  one-way.  In  its  first  18  months  of  operation,  go!  low-
ered fares to $29, $19, $9 and on down to $1. 

A study done for Aloha by Sabre Airline Solutions soon after go! entered the mar-
ket,  indicated  that  with  a  62  percent  load  factor,  which  was  the  average  load  re-
ported  then  by  go!,  Aloha  needed  $50  a  ticket  to  break  even,  Hawaiian  needed  $55 
a  ticket  to  break  even,  and  go!  needed  about  $67  a  ticket  to  pay  for  the  basic  costs 
of its operation. 

We began asking people in government, business, and media, and just about any-

one who would listen, these questions: 

Why would Mesa charge less for a seat than it costs to produce it? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

Why  was  go!  charging  $39,  $29,  $19  or  $1  for  a  seat  that  cost  them  as  much 
as $70 to fly? 
Why would any manufacturer or provider of services offer their product for less 
than what it cost to produce it, for almost 2 years? 
Now  everyone  loves  a  bargain,  particularly  in  air  fares,  but  even  so,  Mesa’s 
strategy of below-cost pricing raised some eyebrows. Even bargain-lovers began 
to ask, ‘‘Why doesn’t somebody do something about it?’’ 

We  did  not  sit  idle.  We  spoke  to  elected  Federal,  state  and  county  officials  and 

newspaper editorial boards. 

We  came  to  Washington  to  ask  the  United  States  Department  of  Transportation 
and  the  United  States  Department  of  Justice  to  look  into  Mesa’s  predatory  pricing 
practices  in  Hawaii,  and  do  something  about  it.  We  spoke  to  various  lawmakers  on 
the Hill. 

Everyone  told  me  that  predatory  pricing  is  hard  to  prove.  I  believe  that  if  there 

is a textbook definition of predatory pricing, this is it. 
Lawsuits 

Not one but both of Hawaii’s legacy inter-island carriers sued Mesa. 
On February 13, 2006, Hawaiian Airlines filed a lawsuit asserting claims against 
Mesa  for  breach  of  a  non-disclosure  agreement  that  Mesa  had  executed  in  April 
2004, during Hawaiian’s bankruptcy proceedings. 

On  January  9,  2007,  Aloha  Airlines  filed  suit  against  Mesa  alleging  that  Mesa 
had misused Aloha’s confidential information and deliberately sought to drive Aloha 
out of business in violation of Federal anti-trust laws. 

In  fact,  court  documents  show  that  Mesa’s  chief  financial  officer  stated  in  an  e- 
mail that, rather than wait for Aloha to die, Mesa should enter the inter-island mar-
ket and give Aloha ‘‘the last push.’’ 

Due to this pending litigation, we will not go into further detail. 
In  spite  of  the  legal  challenges,  Mesa  continues  to  operate  in  Hawaii  with  $49 

inter-island fares. 
Second Bankruptcy 

For the year 2007, Aloha lost $81 million on revenues of $407 million. In January 

2008, we lost $10.6 million on $34 million of revenue. 

In March of this year, after nearly 2 years of escalating fuel prices and cutthroat 
competition,  Aloha’s  lead  investor  opted  to  stop  funding  Aloha  Airlines,  after  a  fur-
ther  infusion  of  approximately  $100  million.  This  came  on  the  day  that  fuel  prices 
hit $111 a barrel. 

Faced  with  that  reality,  we  worked  round-the-clock  in  search  of  new  investment 
for  all  or  part  of  Aloha  Airlines.  We  approached  numerous  airlines  that  we  felt 
would  have  a  strategic  interest  in  Aloha.  But  we  couldn’t  find  one  willing  to  take 
us on, with fuel prices what they are, and the fare war still raging. 

None  agreed  to  finance  Aloha’s  passenger  business,  leading  to  its  shutdown  on 

March 31, 2008. 

Our  senior  management  and  owners  anguished  over  that  decision  to  terminate 
passenger service and did so only after our lenders would not provide further financ-
ing and after all alternative sources of funding were exhausted. 

No  one  wanted  to  believe  that  a  passenger  airline  with  a  62-year  history  of  serv-
ing  Hawaii  could  disappear.  Or  that  2,000  of  our  people  who  supported  passenger 
operations  could  lose  their  jobs  overnight.  But  without  further  financing,  it  had  to 
happen. 

We  are  continuing  round-the-clock  efforts  to  save  Aloha’s  air  cargo  and  contract 

aviation services operations in order to preserve more than 1,000 jobs. 

We  still  hold  out  hope  that  investors  would  look  at  resurrecting  Aloha’s  entire 

passenger operation in the future. 
Impact on Hawaii 

What impact does our situation have on Hawaii? 
Aloha Airlines was the state’s 10th largest private employer. 
We  offered  frequent,  reliable  passenger  service—100  inter-island  flights  a  day— 

linking Hawaii’s four counties and major population centers. 

We  flew  nearly  4  million  passengers  a  year,  including  1  million  visitors  and  resi-
dents  between  Hawaii  and  the  West  Coast.  Aloha  served  Hawaii’s  largest  tourism 
market  in  Southern  California  and  had  the  most  non-stop  flights  from  the  West 
Coast to Maui. 

In support of Hawaii’s statewide airports system, Aloha ranked 2nd overall in air-

line revenue-landing weights, and 3rd in paying state airport-revenue charges. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

We  supported  hundreds  of  nonprofit  organizations  throughout  the  state.  For  ex-
ample,  in  2006,  Aloha  spearheaded  the  annual  fund-raising  event  for  the  Hawaii 
Chapter of the March of Dimes and helped them raise a record $500,000. 

Cargo  and  contract  services  continue  to  operate,  pending  the  sale  of  those  busi-

ness units. They remain a vital part of air transportation in Hawaii. 

Aloha holds the majority of U.S. mail contracts in Hawaii, and carries more than 
85  percent  of  the  state’s  non-mail  air  cargo,  including  time-sensitive  consumer 
goods,  fresh  produce  and  baked  goods,  agricultural  exports,  and  emergency  medical 
supplies; 

And  we  provide  ticketing,  baggage  and  ground-handling  services  for  multiple  do-

mestic and international carriers as their agent. 

Following  the  shutdown  of  Aloha’s  service  to  five  Hawaii,  and  six  Mainland  des-
tinations, ATA Airlines abruptly shut down its Mainland-to-Hawaii routes. As a re-
sult, Oakland, California, and Orange County, California, have no non-stops to Ha-
waii. 

In  total,  20  aircraft  have  been  pulled  out  of  Hawaii  service  from  the  West  Coast. 
Together,  Aloha  and  ATA  carried  15  percent  of  visitor  traffic  to  Hawaii  from  the 
West Coast. 

State  tourism  officials  are  expressing  concern  that  Hawaii  doesn’t  have  enough 
seats  in  key  visitor  markets  and  that  the  loss  of  airlift  could  cost  the  state  up  to 
half a million visitors this year. 

Analysts  say  the  average  fare  from  the  mainland  to  Hawaii  could  rise  by  $200 

a round-trip; and inter-island fares will certainly escalate to pre-Mesa levels. 

To date, we have terminated more than 2,000 employees. It’s been estimated that 
the  State  of  Hawaii  will  have  to  pay  out  as  much  as  $50  million  in  unemployment 
claims.  Even  so,  the  full  impact  of  Aloha’s  situation  has  not  yet  been  felt  and  the 
ripples continue to flow throughout the state. 

Aloha Airlines was begun in 1946. Since then, the men and women of Aloha Air-
lines have been totally involved in the community, volunteering their time for hun-
dreds of community events each year, and the company itself gave generously. 

Aloha’s employees weren’t just good people like those you find throughout the air-
line industry. They were warm, wonderful people who shared a unique spirit of com-
passion and caring for customers and co-workers. We call it the Aloha Spirit. I could 
say more about them but let me show you. 

As  a  testament  to  these  fine  people,  let  me  share  with  you  the  U.S.  Department 
of Transportation’s most recent air travel consumer report, which came out just last 
week. 

Since it began monthly reports in April 2006, Aloha Airlines has consistently been 
one  of  the  Nation’s  best  airlines  for  punctuality,  baggage  delivery,  fewest  cancella-
tions  and  fewest  customer  complaints.  Last  week’s  DOT  report  placed  Aloha  in  the 
Number One position for on-time performance and Number One for fewest customer 
complaints. 

There  may  be  other  airlines  serving  Hawaii  but  there  will  never  be  another  like 

Aloha Airlines. 

Thank you for your kind attention. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Banmiller.  I  realize 

it was not easy testimony, but I thank you for the record. 

Our  next  witness  is  Mr.  Charles  Willis,  Chairman  of  the  Board 

of Island Air. 

STATEMENT OF CHARLES F. WILLIS IV, OWNER AND 

CHAIRMAN OF THE BOARD, ISLAND AIR, ACCOMPANIED BY 

LESLEY KANESHIRO, CFO, ISLAND AIR 

Mr. WILLIS. Mr. Chairman, thank you very much, and also Mem-
bers  of  the  Committee.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  have  Ms. 
Kaneshiro and myself address you. 

I would like to begin by saying that I echo Mr. Banmiller’s senti-
ments  emphatically.  I  certainly  have  known  the  gentleman  for 
many,  many  years.  I  have  been  around  the  airline  business  my 
whole life. 

I just want to give you a brief, sort of where we were, where we 

are, and where we are going. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

Island  Air  is  a  regional  airline  that  has  provided  service  within 
the  State  of  Hawaii  for  27  years.  Between  2004  and  the  first  half 
of  2006,  the  company  expanded  significantly  by  adding  eight  non-
stop routes and over 150 employees. We complemented the jet serv-
ice  and  did  not  compete  directly  with  either  Aloha  or  Hawaiian, 
and we carried roughly 14 percent of the market. 

In  early  2006,  we  brought  in  the  modern  and  fuel-efficient  Bom-
bardier Q400 aircraft, which we still believe is the right aircraft for 
the market. 

Go  Airlines  started  service  and  initiated  a  fare  war  on  the  Is-
lands  at  $1,  $9,  $19,  and  $29,  and  even  free  tickets.  No  airline  or 
aircraft type makes money or breaks even at those prices. 

Where  we  are  currently:  Since  2006,  we  have  reduced  our  work-
force by over 150 employees statewide. That is 40 percent. To date, 
we  have  lost  approximately  $5  million.  We  have  ceased  nonstop 
service  in  eight  neighbor  Island  markets  and  have  been  unable  to 
reinstate lost service. We reduced total scheduled flights by 38 per-
cent.  We  have  closed  freight  service  to  and  from  Lihue,  Kona, 
Maui,  and  Hilo.  We  have  realized  a  30  percent  reduction  in  our 
revenues  and  experienced  an  80  percent  increase  in  fuel  cost  per 
gallon. 

We are being squeezed on the bottom by the FAR 135 single-en-
gine  airplane  carriers  who  are  semi-regulated  and  not  subject  to 
the  same  regulatory  requirements  and  airport  fees  as  we  are.  We 
are  also  squeezed  on  the  top  by  the  mammoth  airlines,  Hawaiian, 
who operate trans-Pacific flights and, thus, can absorb and transfer 
those costs over a larger system. 

Implications of the Aloha bankruptcy: You could possibly end up 
with  one  strong  airline  in  the  marketplace,  Go  with  their  viability 
in  question  right  now  in  a  press  release  that  was  just  issued  yes-
terday. A consolidation of carriers has resulted in massive job cuts, 
fewer  choices,  with  resulting  economics,  as  well  as  a  reduction  or 
cessation of service to many communities. 

Without assistance Island Air will be marginalized with a poten-
tial  reduction  or  elimination  of  service  to  small  communities  and 
point-to-point markets. 

The  plan  going  forward:  Our  intent  is  to  hire  laid-off  Island  Air 
and Aloha employees and reinstate lost service to the eight market 
pairs that we previously serviced and subsequently deserted due to 
the  fare  wars.  We  are  further  interested  in  adding  more  point-to- 
point  routes  as  scheduled  service,  for  example,  Kamuela,  Barbers 
Point, Hana, and Kalaupapa. 

We  are  presently  negotiating  with  aircraft  manufacturers  to 
bring  in  up  to  three  Dash–8–400s  before  the  summer  and  bring 
back  the  Bombardier  Q400s  by  mid  to  late  summer  or  earlier  if 
support  is  provided  and  demand  is  warranted.  We  want  to  com-
plement and provide service where demand for jets is not cost effec-
tive. 

How  you  can  assist  is  to  show  immediate  support  of  the  loan 
guaranty  bill,  HB–509,  and  the  aviation  fuel  tax  exemption  from 
GE  [General  Excise]  tax,  HB–2860,  in  the  Hawaii  State  Legisla-
ture.  I  believe  it  passed  the  Senate  2  days  ago  and  is  off  to  the 
House. Time is of the essence. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

We  need  an  inter-island  cooperation  agreement  between  our-
selves and the existing incumbents to stabilize and to be able to re-
instate  service,  rehire  employees,  as  well  as  reclaim  a  modern  and 
safe aircraft. 

Understand  the  seriousness  of  the  air  travel  plight  in  Hawaii: 
The  increase  in  unemployment,  lack  of  service  to  rural  commu-
nities within the State, potential of future reduction in air carriers 
in Hawaii. 

Mr.  Chairman,  we  need  your  support  now.  This  is  not  an  Aloha 
type situation. But if it is not rectified, we certainly will face great-
er challenges in the future. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and I will be more than happy to an-

swer any questions at this point. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Willis follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHARLES F. WILLIS IV, OWNER, HAWAII ISLAND AIR, INC. 
Dear Senator Inouye and Honorable Committee Members: 
My  name  is  Charles  Willis  IV,  and  I  am  the  Owner  of  Hawaii  Island  Air,  Inc. 
dba  Island  Air.  We  are  a  regional  airline  that  operates  within  the  State  of  Hawaii. 
In  today’s  market  of  rising  prices  all  airlines  are  faced  with  the  challenge  of  cov-
ering  costs  and  meeting  customers  expectations.  The  recent  inter-island  fare  wars, 
the conduct of which is currently subject to litigation has resulted in a dramatic and 
severe  loss  of  revenues  to  inter-island  carriers.  This  is  coupled  with  increasing  fuel 
costs has resulted in significant losses by all the inter-island carriers. 

The  results  of  the  fare  wars  and  increase  in  costs  have  caused  great  hardship  to 
Island  Air  and  to  those  employees  who  were  the  casualty  of  workforce  reduction, 
and a terrible disservice to all of Hawaii’s residents and visitors. Since the fare wars 
began in 2006, Island Air has: 

able to reinstate service to those markets. 

• Ceased  non-stop  services  in  eight  neighbor  Island  markets  and  have  been  un-
• Reduced total scheduled flights by 38 percent. 
• Closed freight service to and from Lihue, Kona, Maui and Hilo. 
• Reduced its workforce by over 150 employees statewide (40 percent). 
• Realized a 30 percent reduction of revenues. 
• Experienced an 80 percent increase in fuel cost per gallon. 
These  factors  have  caused  financial  instabilities  in  the  marketplace  resulting  in 

the reduction of services that Island Air can offer. 

The  unfortunate  closure  of  Aloha  Airlines  provides  Island  Air  with  the  oppor-
tunity  to  position  itself  in  the  marketplace  to  expand  routes  and  service  where  de-
mand exists. 

Thank you for allowing Island Air to present this testimony. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Mr. Willis. 
Ms. Kaneshiro, do you have anything to add? 
Ms. KANESHIRO. No. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
And now may I call on the President and CEO of the Air Trans-

port Association, Mr. May? 

STATEMENT OF JAMES C. MAY, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

AIR TRANSPORT ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA, INC. 

Mr. MAY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. It is always an honor to be 
before you, and Senator Smith, it is a delight to be with you as well 
today. 

I  do  not  think  that  I  can  add  a  great  deal  to  what  has  already 
been  said  this  morning,  and  given  the  lateness  of  the  hour,  I  will 
forgo  a  formal  statement.  I  would  like  to  emphasize  a  few  points 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

and suggest to you a couple of at least lead bullets, if not silver bul-
lets, to the circumstances we face as an industry. 

I  have  great  affection  for  Dave  Banmiller.  He  has  been  a  loyal 
board  member  of  ours  and  a  good  personal  friend.  I  have  huge  af-
fection for the islands of Hawaii. I have been traveling there for 30 
years on vacation every year. 

And I think what has happened there, while it is terrifically un-
fortunate  is  also  a  precursor  to  what  the  whole  industry  faces,  as 
has  been  suggested  here  already  this  morning.  This  industry  is 
beset  by  an  $18  billion  a  year  tax  bill,  principally  to  the  FAA  and 
to  the  TSA.  We  are  beset  by  $55  billion  a  year  in  fuel  costs  pro-
jected  for  2008.  That  is  about  $14  billion  more  per  year  than  we 
paid a year ago. That is the equivalent of 330 new fuel-efficient air-
craft. That is the equivalent of 440,000 employees. 

And we are taking as an industry all of the dramatic actions that 
you have heard David and Mr. Willis talk about already this morn-
ing.  We  are  laying  off  employees,  unfortunately.  We  are  offering 
early  retirement  to  large  numbers  of  employees.  We  are  elimi-
nating  some  destinations  altogether,  and  those  are  principally 
smaller  destinations.  We  are  cutting  frequencies.  We  are  doing  ev-
erything we can to recoup additional revenue. It has been well pub-
licized.  Some  of  the  revenue  measures  that  the  carriers  are  pur-
suing  for  additional  fees  for  bags  and  so  on  and  so  forth.  And  the 
unfortunate  reality  is  that  we  have  cut,  through  previous  bank-
ruptcies  and  the  loss  of  some  $35  billion  as  an  industry  early  on 
in  this  century,  most  of  that  low-hanging  fruit,  if  you  will,  and 
there is very little room or fat to cut in the operations. 

And the principal factor for that, as I said a minute ago, is fuel. 
It  is  overwhelmingly  our  number  one  cost  center  today.  Yesterday 
New  York  Harbor  crude,  which  is  a  good  benchmark  of  what  we 
have to do in this industry, hit $150 a barrel—1-5-0. And we were 
paying just a few short years ago $20–$25 a barrel. It is outrageous 
and it is extraordinary. 

I  would  suggest  to  you  there  are  three  or  four  things  that  this 
Committee  can  pursue  that  would  be  of  short-term  or  immediate 
benefit to the circumstances we find ourselves in. 

First  and  foremost,  I  would  urge  you  to  ask  the  Administration 
not to continue to fill the Strategic Petroleum Reserve when prices 
are as high as they are. We have a more than adequate reserve in 
play  today.  I  think  the  number  is  70  billion  barrels  of  fuel  in  that 
reserve  today.  And  yet  we  continue  to  fill  that  at  today’s  prices 
which  are  outrageously  high.  It  makes  no  economic  sense  or  secu-
rity sense whatsoever. 

The  second  thing  I  would  recommend  that  this  committee  con-
sider urging the Administration to do is to release about 10 million 
barrels  from  that  SPR.  That  all  by  itself  is  not  going  to  have  a 
huge impact on oil prices, but I think it sends a signal to the specu-
lators that they are likely to get short and that this administration 
will  take  action  to  try  and  drive  prices  down.  And  I  think  it  will 
have some kind of meaningful effect. 

At  the  same  time,  there  is  a  New  England  Heating  Oil  Reserve 
that  is  about  2  million  barrels.  The  crisis  time  for  heating  in  New 
England  has  passed  for  this  calendar  year,  and  I  think  they  could 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

release that into the market to make a very real difference in sup-
ply. 

The  next  thing—and  it  is  not  a  new  subject  to  this  Committee 
by  any  circumstances—but  do  no  harm.  Try  and  make  sure  that 
the TSA and the CBP and others do not continue to add additional 
burdens onto this industry which are terribly burdensome and are, 
quite  frankly,  the  responsibility  of  the  Federal  Government  to 
begin with. 

The third thing is pass meaningful FAA reform, and by meaning-
ful  FAA  reform,  I  would  encourage  this  Committee  not  to  do—you 
have done well in drafting that legislation and passing that legisla-
tion out of Committee thus far, but we need to make sure that be-
fore  it  goes  further,  it  has  a  good,  clear,  clean,  balanced,  and  fair 
funding  formula.  The  vast  majority  of  that  $18  billion  a  year  that 
we  spend  in  taxes  as  an  industry  and  that  our  passengers  are 
charged  is  a  direct  result  of  the  fees  that  we  pay  to  the  FAA,  and 
those  need  to  be  rebalanced.  That  in  turn,  I  think,  will  yield  a 
much  more  modern  and  positive  air  traffic  control  system  that  al-
lows  us,  as  Mr.  Banmiller  said,  to  fly  more  efficiently  and  produc-
tively, cutting our fuel costs to the extent that we can. 

Mr. Chairman, we have a long history of working with this Com-
mittee  under  your  leadership  and  that  of  Co-Chairman  Stevens, 
and  we  look  forward  to  continuing  to  work  with  you.  We  will  be 
happy to answer any questions you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. May follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES C. MAY, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

AIR TRANSPORT ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA, INC. 
Good afternoon, Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee. 
I  appreciate  your  urgent  concerns  about  the  future  of  air  service  in  Hawaii.  Air 
transportation  is  essential  to  the  economic  health  and  social  fabric  of  the  state  and 
of all Hawaiians. Without a question, the shutdown of passenger service and auction 
of its air cargo business by Aloha Airlines is painful, not only for its employees and 
their  families,  but  also  for  the  overall  ease  of  travel  and  shipping  throughout  the 
islands.  People  depend  on  air  travel  to  meet  their  needs  and  support  the  state’s  vi-
brant tourism industry in a fundamental, unique way. 

Truth be told, my affinity for Hawaii goes back some 25 years. My wife and I visit 
Hawaii  every  year  and  have  traveled  extensively  among  the  islands.  It  is  hard  for 
me  personally  to  imagine  a  more  idyllic  paradise,  so  I  am  keenly  interested  in  the 
state’s well-being. 

Although I would like to reassure you that the recent service disruption is nothing 
more than a passing anomaly in an otherwise stable airline industry, nothing could 
be  further  from  the  truth.  Some  analysts  view  Hawaii  as  just  the  beginning  of  a 
sea change in the Nation’s air transportation network. 

And  change  will  come  because  U.S.  airlines  are  facing  overwhelming  odds:  U.S. 
airlines’  significant  increases  in  taxes,  fees,  security  burdens  and  environmental 
costs;  ongoing  labor  concerns;  staggering  capital  costs  for  new  aircraft  and  infra-
structure improvements; and unprecedented fuel prices. From 2001 to 2006, the in-
dustry lost $35 billion and more than 20 carriers filed for bankruptcy (including four 
of  the  six  large  network  carriers),  employee  benefits  and  numbers  were  cut;  planes 
were parked; and the industry scrimped to cut costs. 

In  2007,  the  future  looked  somewhat  brighter.  With  a  modest  profit,  the  airlines 
seemed to have turned the corner. But in 2008, our shaky recovery hit a brick wall: 
the economy deteriorated and jet fuel prices went through the roof. Today the fore-
cast is grim. 

Record-high  fuel  prices  were  the  breaking  point  for  some  airlines.  This  year  the 
industry likely will pay $55 billion for fuel—$14 billion more than last year—a stag-
gering 35 percent increase. That’s the equivalent of employing 440,000 airline work-
ers  full-time  or  purchasing  330  new  wide-body  airplanes.  Last  week,  jet  fuel  aver-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

aged  $135  per  barrel—a  30  percent-plus  increase  since  January.  In  Hawaii,  some 
pay a premium for jet fuel that increases the financial hit. 

Mr.  Chairman,  yesterday  brought  even  more  discouraging  news.  The  price  of 
home heating oil in the New York Harbor a well-accepted price marker for jet fuel— 
jumped to over $150 per barrel. That’s a record that shocked even the most seasoned 
analysts. 

With  the  brutal  jet  fuel  costs  and  elimination  of  the  low-hanging,  ‘‘cost-saving’’ 
fruit gone, airlines large and small again are forced to take painful steps that have 
painful  consequences  for  their  customers,  employees  and  shareholders.  Airlines  are 
literally fighting for survival as they: 

• File  for  Bankruptcy:  Three  carriers  filed  in  the  past  2  weeks—Aloha  Airlines, 
ATA  Airlines  and  Skybus.  Champion  Air,  a  charter  operator,  will  stop  service 
at the end of May. After 61 years and facing severe financial difficulties, Aloha 
shut down passenger service—laying off some 2,000 employees and terminating 
aircraft  and  ground-support  leases.  The  impact  on  Hawaii’s  economy,  its  pas-
sengers and shippers, is abrupt and widespread. 

• Cut  Employees:  Delta  offered  early  retirement  to  30,000  employees—half  of  its 
workforce—to  eventually  reduce  headcount  by  2,000;  American  and  Northwest 
announced hiring freezes. 

• Charge  for  Amenities:  Carriers  are  imposing  additional  fees  for  extra  and  over- 
size bags; telephone reservations, onboard meals; unaccompanied minor service; 
and  pet  transport.  Some  carriers  also  have  added  fuel  surcharges,  particularly 
on international routes. 

• Cut  Unprofitable  Service:  United,  Delta,  Northwest  and  others  are  parking 
planes; carriers are reducing service on marginal routes and eliminating service 
on unprofitable routes. Delta will end service to several small communities and 
US  Airways  cut  30  percent  of  its  overnight  flights  into  Las  Vegas.  If  demand 
softens as the economy weakens, more unprofitable routes may be cut. 

None of these changes are popular with our passengers. As airlines try to pass on 
their  increased  operating  costs,  the  number  and  volume  of  complaints  will  jump 
even higher. 

In  short,  we’re  doing  everything  we  can  to  get  ourselves  out  of  this  tailspin.  But 

there is a limit to how much more we can cut costs and increase revenue. 

The  Nation’s  economy  depends  on  a  vibrant  national  air  transportation  network 
with  secure  access  to  a  stable,  rationally  priced  fuel  supply.  That  is  not  what  we 
have  today.  The  only  solution  is  for  the  Federal  Government  to  develop  a  national 
energy  policy  and  a  forward-looking  aviation  policy.  As  these  policies  takes  shape, 
we’ve  asked  the  administration  to  do  what  it  can  now  to  alleviate  the  pressure  on 
fuel  prices.  We’ve  asked  the  Department  of  Energy  to  stop  filling  the  Strategic  Pe-
troleum Reserve that takes fuel out of the marketplace and increases costs, and for 
a  release  from  the  Home  Heating  Oil  Reserve  to  remove  the  premium  for  jet  fuel. 
In  closing,  record-high  fuel  costs  touch  passengers  and  shippers  in  ways  they  do 
not  like—the  people  of  Hawaii  will  feel  the  demise  of  Aloha  as  their  everyday  lives 
are  impacted.  One  key  component  of  the  national  air  transportation  system  has 
been  hit  hard.  The  Federal  Government  must  take  some  bold  steps  very  soon,  or 
the entire system will suffer. 

Thank you. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  May.  Your  sugges-
tions,  as  they  relate  to  the  reserve  system,  I  think  are  deserving 
of  further  inquiry.  If  I  may,  I  would  have  my  staff  call  upon  your 
staff to see if hearings are justified. 

Mr.  MAY.  Mr.  Chairman,  we  would  be  happy  to  participate.  We 
would  be  happy  to  suggest  some  experts  in  the  area  of  fuel.  It  is 
not, as Senator Smith suggested, a pure silver bullet, but it is cer-
tainly something that will have an impact. 

When we are averaging $135 a barrel in this industry—and that 
is because the so-called crack spread, the refining premium, Jet A, 
is  so  terribly,  terribly  high.  It  has  gone  up  just  as  much  on  a  per-
centage  basis  as  the  cost  of  the  raw  product  to  begin  with.  And  it 
is those middle distillates in that barrel that are so terribly expen-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

sive.  Diesel  fuel  here,  if  you  happen  to  drive  a  diesel  car—and  the 
truckers I am sure you are hearing from—it is just amazing. 

And anything that can be done is a marginal benefit because we 
have  lost  five  carriers.  We  are  going  to  lose  more.  Small  commu-
nities  are  going  to  lose  service.  50-seat  RJ’s  are  the  least  efficient 
planes  in  the  fleet.  So  Bend,  Oregon  and  other  places  are  going  to 
be very much at risk. And we cannot help it with fuel being as ex-
pensive as it is today. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Mr. May. 
Our  final  member  of  the  panel  is  Mr.  Fukunaga.  Do  you  have 

anything to add here? 
STATEMENT OF BARRY FUKUNAGA, CHIEF OF STAFF, OFFICE 

OF GOVERNOR LINDA LINGLE, STATE OF HAWAII 

Mr.  FUKUNAGA.  Thank  you,  Chair  Inouye  and  Senator  Smith.  I 
do  realize  that  we  were  a  late  addition  to  the  panel,  and  I  do  not 
have  written  testimony  as  a  result.  But  I  do  appreciate  the  oppor-
tunity to join this august body and to appear before you. 

My prior experience was I was a director at the Hawaii State De-
partment  of  Transportation  before  my  current  position.  In  my  ear-
lier  life,  I  did  25  years  at  the  international  airport,  15  of  which  I 
was the manager there. 

The  situation  that  we  see  today  is  certainly  profound.  It  is  not 
like  anything  that  I  have  ever  experienced  in  my  time  at  the  air-
port.  And  I  certainly  sympathize  with  the  plight  that  is  faced  by 
the air carriers. 

When  all  of  this  came  about,  we  certainly  had  a  real  concern 
about  the  impact  that  the  shutdown  of  a  carrier  like  Aloha  would 
have on our State, simply as an island economy. We are so depend-
ent on connectivity by air. As a result, we quickly rode to help the 
employees  and  certainly  the  stranded  passengers,  and  I  think  the 
industry as a whole in Hawaii, our travel partners, made that pos-
sible for us to do that. 

But looking forward, we do not see the ability to really entice or 
encourage  a  significant  amount  of  increase,  and  that  is  an  area  of 
concern for us. 

Nevertheless, I think we really need to work closely with the car-
riers that do service our islands so that we can continue to embrace 
and  embody  travel  opportunities  for  those  not  only  who  reside  in 
our state, but also those that come to visit us. 

The  Administration  has  certainly  been  concerned  about  the  reli-
ance  on  air  alone.  So  we  introduced  the  support  of  Hawaii’s 
Superferry,  and  hopefully  we  will  be  able  to  offer  at  least  options 
and alternatives, if they can be successful in providing their trade. 
The Airports Division has taken on an airport modernization pro-
gram in collaboration with the air carriers that operate in Hawaii. 
It  is  a  $2.3  billion  effort.  Certainly  it  is  intended  to  not  only  up-
grade  and  improve  our  facilities,  but  to  make  it  easier  so  that  the 
carriers  and  operators  and  the  users  of  our  facilities  find  them-
selves  able  to  do  so  more  efficiently  and  thereby  reduce  some  of 
their operating costs. 

It  is  important  that  we  continue  to  recognize  that  our  system  is 
unique  in  terms  of  airports.  We  operate  all  of  our  major  airports 
throughout  the  State.  We  are  unique  in  that  respect  and,  as  a  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

sult, have been able to provide service to our neighbor islands over 
and  beyond  what  they  would  otherwise  be  able  to  do  if  they  were 
left only to themselves and the traffic that they generate. 

As  a  result,  we  continue  to  retain  a  differential  in  our  fees  and 
charges  to  our  inter-island  air  carriers  such  that  they  can  be  able 
to  operate  at  a  lower  cost  than  what  would  otherwise  be  the  norm 
because we can subsidize these operations through the activity that 
is conducted through Honolulu International Airport. 

We provide a preferential hold room price. It is about 64 percent 
of  what  the  others  would  be  charged  using  that  same  facility  for 
inter-island  carriers,  and  the  same  thing  with  a  joint  facility  utili-
zation  charge.  These  things,  I  think,  certainly  help  and  encourage 
that. 

And yet, we see the reduction in inter-island airlift primarily be-
cause,  as  was  mentioned  earlier,  of  the  direct  flight  by  overseas 
carriers to our neighbor islands. Yet, we still need to maintain that 
connectivity between our islands for our residents and for the visi-
tors  that  have  the  opportunity  to  move  between  our  islands.  And 
we  certainly  would  like  to  see  more  support  in  that  area,  and  it  is 
certainly something that we would be involved with. 

It  was  mentioned  that  the  EAS  service  does  benefit  three  of  our 
smaller  communities,  but  what  we  experienced  with  the  EAS  pro-
gram is that the company that was awarded the bid essentially in-
dicated  that  they  no  longer  needed  the  subsidy.  That  action  alone 
resulted in their raising rates, and we saw some drop-off in service. 
There have been numerous complaints about that activity, the fact 
that  they  did  not  provide  the  kind  of  frequency  that  was  antici-
pated or expected. And that creates a problem. 

The fact that they are providing service means that the DOT will 
not open up a bid opportunity again. And we feel that it was impor-
tant  to  do  that.  We  need  to  provide  service  to  these  communities 
that would otherwise be held hostage without it. 

It  was  mentioned  early  in  a  news  release  that  the  cost  to  go  to 
Hana  was  equivalent  to  the  same  travel  between  Hawaii  and  the 
West  Coast.  Now,  that  certainly  cannot  be,  and  that  is  a  problem. 
Communities  like  Hana,  which  only  have  a  roadway  to  connect 
them,  and  a  long  one  at  that,  depend  on  it.  The  hotel  there  pro-
vides  employment  to  a  remote  community  that  helps  sustain  that 
particular economy. So it is important that we try to get that kind 
of  service.  As  small  as  it  may  be,  it  talks  about  the  problems  that 
we face and the challenges that we encounter in trying to maintain 
and provide for our communities throughout our State. 

So  going  forward,  I  think  it  was  mentioned  about  the  pending 
legislation. We are coming down to a crunch where it is going into 
committees, and we need to see these bits of legislation passed. We 
had  mentioned  to  the  State  legislature  that  the  loan  agreement 
would need some adjustments. There is no provision in our current 
administrative budget to provide the kind of funding that would be 
needed  to  underwrite  these  loans.  We  need  about  25  percent  of 
what the loan would be offering. The legislature will have to make 
that adjustment to the state’s budget so that we can do that. 

Second,  the  fuel  surcharge  that  would  be  levied  on  our  inter-is-

land carriers—we are supportive of that measure as well. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

So the Governor has always made it known that she is interested 
and  open  to  exploring  any  possibility  that  is  out  there  in  terms  of 
programs,  but  we  would  do  so  judiciously  and  in  concert  and  dis-
cussion with our operating partners to make sure that what we do 
put  into  play  does  not  adversely  or  inadvertently  create  a  problem 
bigger than the solution that it seems to want to offer. 

So  with  that,  I  certainly  appreciate  the  opportunity  again  for 
being here and having the chance to join this group. Certainly I am 
available for questions. Thank you. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Mr. Fukunaga. 
Now, if I may, I would like to ask Mr. Banmiller a few questions. 
Mr. BANMILLER. Yes, Mr. Chairman. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Is  Aloha  Airlines  doing  anything  to  assist  em-

ployees in transitioning to other employment? 

Mr.  BANMILLER.  Yes,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  discussed  this  issue  last 
week  with  the  CEO  of  First  Hawaiian  Bank  and  the  mayor.  And 
there  was  a  job  fair  that  was  held  yesterday  at  the  Blaisdell  Cen-
ter.  And  I  am  pleased  to  report  that  there  were  almost  200  em-
ployer  groups  set  up  there  to  interview  our  employees,  I  think,  in 
part a testament to the quality of our employee population. And 50 
businesses  were  actually  turned  down  because  they  ran  out  of 
space,  and  last  reports  were  1,600  people  were  in  there  inter-
viewing and talking about employment. 

We  had  separately  set  up  resume  services  in  that  same  facility 

to assist people in developing their resumes. 

We  have  separately  been  in  touch  with  the  State  Department  of 
Labor  and  have  set  up  separate  groups  to  work  directly  with  our 
employees to educate them on things like health care, COBRA, and 
there  is  a  separate  website  that  has  grown  out  of  the  job  fair  to 
assist employees in linking them up with employers. 

So  we  feel,  even  under  these  difficult  circumstances,  Mr.  Chair-
man,  that  there  is  a  lot  of  very  positive  activity  going  on  in  terms 
of the employment of these fine people. 

The CHAIRMAN. So are you confident that most, if not all, of your 

employees will have new employment? 

Mr.  BANMILLER.  Sir,  that  word  ‘‘confidence’’  I  used  to  have  more 
of until I got into the past couple years in this business, but I think 
the answer is yes. Between some requirements that Hawaiian Air-
lines  is  going  to  have,  coupled  with  a  fairly  low  unemployment 
level,  particularly  in  certain  of  the  locations,  our  people  will  be 
mostly absorbed. And it is our job to facilitate that. 

The CHAIRMAN. In your statement, you indicated that cargo oper-

ations are continuing. 

Mr. BANMILLER. Yes, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. Is your intention to continue or to sell this? 
Mr. BANMILLER. In the current process, all of the assets of Aloha 
Airlines are up for sale through the Chapter 11 process. When you 
look  at  the  four  divisions  that  we  operated,  cargo  was  the  most 
profitable,  in  part  because  we  were  able  to  manage  our  own  fuel 
situation  and  our  customers.  The  second  was  contract  services 
where  we  service  other  carriers.  That  is  modestly  breakeven  and 
employs about 1,000 people. 

The passenger service inter-island and the ones on the mainland 
were  both  most  vulnerable  to  fuel  and  Mesa’s  activity  inter-island. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

As a result, when we ran out of money, we found nobody that was 
willing to support the passenger end of the business. 

We  did,  however,  in  terms  of  our  responsibilities  to  the  lenders, 
who  now  have  a  focus  on  the  assets  of  the  company,  see  what  we 
needed  to  do  to  sell  the  various  assets  of  the  company.  If  someone 
were  to  come  in  during  this  process,  which  is  going  on  over  the 
next several weeks, supervised by the bankruptcy court, and wish-
es to buy the entire operation, including the name, that is certainly 
a possibility. I do not see that indication, but it is a possibility. 

There  are  many  people  interested  in  the  cargo  operation.  We 
have  maybe  40  interested  entities  of  which  I  would  characterize 
five  as  extremely  serious.  And  their  view  would  be  to  step  in  and 
take over the cargo operation as we run it today. 

The CHAIRMAN. Are you considering any prospects for future pas-

senger operations? 

Mr. BANMILLER. We are, Chairman. The problem is with the con-
ditions  in  the  marketplace  and  the  subprime  problem,  the  access 
to  money,  the  investor  that  we  found  several  years  ago  we  do  not 
believe  is  out  there.  We  could  be  surprised.  We  still  are  having 
talks with several people, but I am not optimistic. 

The  other  was  strategic  opportunity  with  other  airlines,  and 
frankly, in those discussions the airline executives have said to us, 
in  addition  to  the  fare  war  inter-island,  the  cost  of  fuel  is  such  a 
problem  for  the  industry  in  general  that  where  several  years  ago 
joining  forces  with  us  might  have  been  an  opportunity,  it  really  is 
not today. So we hold out some hope, Chairman, but we see no ac-
tive participants on the passenger side at this point. 

The CHAIRMAN. You have heard Mr. May in his opening remarks 

about the Reserve. 

Mr. BANMILLER. Yes, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. Do you agree with him? 
Mr.  BANMILLER.  Yes,  I  do,  and  especially  at  the  price  point  that 
we  are  looking  at  today,  those  of  us  in  the  industry  going  through 
the  daily  problems  of  keeping  the  ship  afloat  and  having  to  fur-
lough  people,  combine  operations,  and  faced  with  all  of  our  daily 
challenges,  to  put  it  frankly,  look  at  an  administration  that  does 
not seem as sensitive to our current plight and to hear not just the 
woes of Aloha Airlines, but within the industry, and look the other 
way,  I  personally  do  not  understand  it.  And  I  support  Jim  May  in 
his  observations  and  I  suspect  every  airline  CEO  would  say  the 
same. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  have  further  questions,  but  I  will  yield  now  to 

Senator Smith. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr. Banmiller, I want to make sure as a preface to my questions 
you  do  not  take  this  as  any  criticism  of  you  or  your  airline,  but  I 
am going to be asking these based on my own desire to learn more 
about the problem of deregulation. 

You  made  the  comment  that  you  started  with  TWA.  You  shared 
counters with Eastern and Pan Am. These were great marquees of 
my  boyhood  memory,  and  they  are  gone.  Are  they  gone  because  of 
deregulation? 

Mr.  BANMILLER.  I  think  if  you  were  carrier-specific,  it  would  be 
better  to  isolate  the  dilemmas.  As  an  example,  you  can  put  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

blame  on  certain  carriers  on  management,  ownership  changes,  ag-
gressive  behavior,  and  mergers.  You  need  to  almost  go  by  carrier. 
Eastern  was  a  combination  of  all  kinds  of  things  that  I  would  not 
necessarily lay on deregulation. 

Senator SMITH. But are you arguing for us to re-regulate? 
Mr. BANMILLER. I would argue a revisit of the regulation process. 
Total re-regulation I do not endorse. I do not think that toothpaste, 
as  they  say,  can  be  put  back  in  the  tube.  I  think  for  the  State  of 
Hawaii,  it  was  a  problem  because  I  do  not  think  it  was  geographi-
cally considered. I think there is an answer between regulation and 
deregulation. 

When  I  said  we  deregulated  revenue,  the  markets  were  open. 
You could go anywhere and it was crazy in 1978–1979. But nobody 
looked  at  the  expense  columns.  What  is  it  going  to  cost?  What  are 
the  labor  agreements?  What  are  the  agreements  and  responsibil-
ities with the pensions? And as a result, we all focused on opening 
up markets and not the expense side, and some of the carriers that 
lost were foolhardy in those early days. 

Senator  SMITH.  Well,  to  that  point,  Jim  May,  I  am  from  Pen-
dleton,  Oregon.  We  used  to  have  United  Airlines  fly  in  there  and 
fly  empty  planes  in  and  out  of  there,  and  we  loved  having  United 
Airlines there. 

Mr.  MAY.  They  are  missing  one  of  the  great  rodeos  in  America. 
Senator  SMITH.  And  it  still  is.  It  has  been  filled  by  another  car-
rier and occasionally a second one, and so we have air service still. 
But  I  have  wondered  in  my  own  mind.  I  am  not  a  re-regulator. 
I  will  state  that  right  up  front.  I  have  made  a  list  of  your  sugges-
tions. I think that they are excellent. But you also said no new bur-
dens.  Re-regulation  would  represent,  I  think,  a  significant  addi-
tional burden. 

Mr.  MAY.  Senator  Smith,  I  would  beg  to  differ  ever  so  slightly 
with my good friend, Mr. Banmiller, in that I would argue that air-
lines  remain  one  of  the  most  highly  regulated  businesses  in  the 
world  today.  We  have  had  prices  deregulated.  We  have  had  routes 
deregulated,  but  I  think  it  stops  right  about  there.  I  can  go  down 
the list of the amount of regulation that we have with the FAA and 
the DOT and the TSA and the CBP and the Department of Home-
land  Security  and  the  State  Department,  and  we  can  go  right  on 
down the line. There are very few things that happen at an airline 
that  do  not  require  some  governmental  supervision  or  responsi-
bility.  So  I  do  not  think  that  simply  re-regulating  is  the  answer. 
I would suggest that a pretty good case could be made for further 
deregulating  this  industry  and  get  us  out  of  the  business  of  some 
of  the  responsibilities  in  the  areas  of  security,  for  example,  rebal-
ance the equation on FAA funding, things of that sort, and I think 
that would go more to reducing the economic burden. 

Senator  SMITH.  Well,  how  about  as  it  relates  to—you  know,  we 
give  slots  at  airports.  We  give  airspace  and  we  do  that  federally. 
How  about  getting  a  flight  to  Hana  that  keeps  Hana  in  business 
and  Pendleton,  Oregon  in  business?  In  exchange,  should  there  be 
some  sort  of  re-regulation  in  that  sense  for  the  rural  folks  in  the 
Hawaiian  islands  to  continue  to  have  some  measure  of  protection 
in terms of passenger transportation? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

Mr.  MAY.  We  have  always  supported  the  EAS  program,  and  I 
think  this  committee  needs  to  continue  to  take  a  hard  look  at  it 
and  see  how  it  can  be  improved  because  it  is  always  going  to  be 
a very tough economic put, if you will, for a lot of particularly small 
communities.  I  love  Hana.  It  is  one  of  the  garden  spots  of  this 
world. 

Senator  SMITH.  I  spent  my  honeymoon  there.  I  think  the  same 

thing. 

Mr.  MAY.  So  we  both  share  that  affection.  But  it  is  going  to  be 
a  difficult  place  to  maintain  economically  viable  service  on  a  reg-
ular basis without some form of government assistance or subsidy. 

Mr. BANMILLER. Senator Smith, may I just add one comment? 
Senator SMITH. Yes. 
Mr.  BANMILLER.  When  I  said  deregulation  versus  regulation,  I 
agree  with  Jim  May.  My  point  was  how  do  you,  in  our  situation, 
address everybody I could talk to about the predatory pricing activ-
ity  and  everybody  said  we  cannot  do  anything  about  it.  So  some-
where  between  the  Department  of  Justice,  the  Department  of 
Transportation, all the regulators, there must be an answer in here 
somewhere  other  than  we  cannot  do  anything  about  it.  And  now  I 
sit here before you. 

Senator  SMITH.  Mr.  Chairman,  if  I  could  ask  one  more  question. 
The CHAIRMAN. Please. 
Senator  SMITH.  Let  me  just  say  up  front,  again  so  you  do  not 
take  this  in  any  way  personally.  I  am  not  trying  to  insult  Aloha 
Airlines.  I  have  used  it  many  times  and  have  affection  for  it  as 
well. 

But I wonder if you could go back now, go back to 1978, are there 
things  that  Aloha  should  have  been  doing  to  get  ready  for  a  Mesa 
Airlines  and  Go?  I  mean,  the  mix  of  airplanes?  Were  there  con-
tracts  that  were  agreed  to  that  just  simply  were  unsustainable  in 
a deregulated environment? 

Mr.  BANMILLER.  Senator,  I  will  be  honest  and  say  I  wish  I  had 
that answer. I am sure, between 1978 and now, the company could 
have done some things differently like any company. 

Senator  SMITH.  Well,  no  company,  in  defense  of  Aloha,  can  deal 
with  these  kinds  of  fuel  increases.  As  far  as  I  am  concerned,  you 
are off the hook on that basis alone. 

But  as  you  look  back  at  it—it  just  seems  to  me  that  we  are  in 
a  world  now  where  oil  is  just  going  to  get  shorter  and  shorter  and 
shorter because we have these huge emerging middle classes of the 
biggest  populated  nations  on  Earth,  and  they  are  buying  cars  and 
they  are  buying  planes  and  they  are  joining  the  industrialized 
world. And it is a resource that, at least in our country, we do not 
believe in tapping anymore. 

Mr.  BANMILLER.  I  think  what  happened  in  1978  with  deregula-
tion,  there  was  something  called  the  Public  Utilities  Commission. 
We had it in California. I think perhaps the company, if they had, 
should  have  been  more  vociferous  in  saying  we  do  not  have  roads. 
We  do  not  have  rail.  And  when  you  are  in  the  continental  United 
States, you view transportation differently. 

When  I  went  to  Hawaii,  I  had  a  different  view  of  transportation 
than I do now because the only way to get to each one of those is-
lands  really  is  to  fly.  The  ferry  does  not  really  work  comfortably 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

and  it  does  not  promote  commerce.  Having  the  ability  perhaps  for 
Hawaii not to have jumped into deregulation in the way that it did, 
that probably should have been visited a bit differently. 

Senator SMITH. Is Go Airlines making money? 
Mr. BANMILLER. No, sir. 
Senator  SMITH.  Have  you  got  a  case?  It  sounds  to  me  like  you 
have a case in terms of predatory pricing, I mean, if you are giving 
a  seat  away  for  9  bucks  and  fuel  costs  being  what  they  are.  Are 
they filling their seats? 

Mr.  BANMILLER.  On  advice  of  counsel,  I  am  going  to  give  you  a 
modified  remark.  A  50-seat  airplane  does  not  work  in  the  islands 
because  of  the  high  cycles.  We  fly  20–30  minute  trips.  That  is  not 
the airplane that works. So in addition to that, we estimated—and 
they  have  now  admitted  to  losses,  $20  million–$25  million  a  year. 
That is on four airplanes. 

Senator SMITH. Have they added seats, flights since you have left 

the market? 

Mr. BANMILLER. They have added some flights. Yes. 
Senator SMITH. Have their prices gone up? 
Mr.  BANMILLER.  They  still  have  $49  fares,  although  I  believe 
their inventory of $49 is probably going down. And I suspect within 
the  next  6  months,  the  fares  in  the  State  of  Hawaii,  the  average 
fares, are going to be up substantially. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Can I ask a few questions, Mr. Fukunaga? Listening to your com-
ments,  am  I  correct  to  assume  that  Governor  Lingle  will  support 
and  sign  into  law  the  airline  loan  guaranty  program  and  the  tax 
exemption for jet fuel? 

Mr.  FUKUNAGA.  On  the  tax  exemption,  she  would.  We  supported 
that  piece  of  legislation.  We  recognize  the  application  to  our  inter- 
island operators is certainly advantageous. 

On the loan guaranty, we asked the legislature to make some ad-
justments so that such a bill could be made viable. In other words, 
there  is  no  funding  that  was  provided  for  it.  Certainly  it  is  not  in 
our administrative budget. And so they would have to provide that 
for  us  so  that  we  can  have  a  mechanism  that  would  be  capable  of 
supporting  loans.  Again,  your  comments  earlier  about  lenders  rec-
ognizing  the  plight  of  our  carriers  to  make  those  loans  available 
certainly  would  be  the  other  half  of  the  dimension  there.  But  she 
certainly is supportive. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  In  your  testimony,  you  spoke  of  EAS  commu-
nities  having  reduced  service  and  receiving  a  lot  of  complaints. 
Have you transmitted these complaints to DOT? 

Mr.  FUKUNAGA.  We  are  not  allowed  to  do  that,  but  we  did  men-
tion  to  Representative  Hirono  and  had  her  put  her  staff  in  contact 
with  the  source  of  the  complaints  so  that  they  could  work  that  di-
rectly because it is an issue that is outside of our jurisdiction. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Did  you  say  that  the  Governor  cannot  commu-

nicate with DOT? 

Mr.  FUKUNAGA.  On  the  issue  of  asking  them  to  get  involved. 
That is my understanding, and that is the reason why we took this 
other alternative approach. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

The  CHAIRMAN.  You  mean  the  law  prohibits  our  Governor  from 

communicating with DOT? 

Mr. FUKUNAGA. I believe that we cannot get involved in the EAS 
process. It is not one that the State is involved in. And so we have 
to  just  put  the  parties  together  to  make  sure  they  understand  the 
impact of the situation that we are experiencing. 

Essentially  the  request  was  to  allow  the  USDOT  to  reopen  the 
bidding  opportunity  even  though  there  is  service  being  provided, 
and I think because that service is being provided, the requirement 
is  being  met  in  terms  of  having  service.  The  question  is  not  so 
much the service but the quality of the service and the type of serv-
ice. I think that is the thing that is creating some difficulty. 

Hana  is  one  example.  Kalaupapa  is  maybe  even  more  difficult. 
Obviously, the patients and the residents who are there depend on 
a lot greater reliability and reasonable cost in terms of being serv-
iced. So we would certainly like to see that issue be addressed. 

The CHAIRMAN. Secretary Reynolds, is the Governor of the State 
of  Hawaii  prohibited  from  communicating  with  you  on  matters  of 
EAS complaints? 

Mr.  REYNOLDS.  I  am  not  familiar  with  any  restriction  from  our 
end.  We  routinely  seek  the  views  of  local  officials,  including  State 
officials  in  many  cases,  whenever  we  are  involved  in  a  particular 
Essential Air Service case. 

We  are  aware  of  some  of  the  issues  at  Hana.  Congresswoman 
Hirono has brought those to our attention. And we have been work-
ing  a  little  bit  with  the  carrier  there.  Of  course,  as  Mr.  Fukunaga 
indicated, the carrier is providing subsidy-free service at this time, 
but  we  are  working  with  the  carrier  on  some  of  the  issues  associ-
ated with some of the complaints that we have heard. 

But to your point, I am not familiar with any restrictions on con-
tacting us. I do not believe there are any such restrictions, at least 
on our end. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Mr.  Secretary,  does  your  Department  monitor 

predatory practices in the aviation business? 

Mr.  REYNOLDS.  We  do  not  actively  monitor  predatory  pricing  in 
the  airline  industry.  In  the  past,  airlines  have  come  to  us  and 
brought  us  what  they  feel—allegations  of  predatory  pricing  in  the 
past. But we do not actively monitor fares at this point. 

The CHAIRMAN. Now, when they do submit a complaint, what do 

you do about it? 

Mr.  REYNOLDS.  It  depends  on  the  particular  type  of  complaint. 
Usually an air carrier will provide its allegations and then provide 
evidence  and  other  information  to  support  it.  Depending  on  what 
is happening, we will look into it and we will speak with the other 
carriers involved if there is an actual investigation going on. 

I will note that, of course, when it comes to predatory pricing, we 
share  jurisdiction  over  anticompetitive  behavior  with  the  Justice 
Department.  And  when  it  comes  to  taking  formal  actions,  the  Jus-
tice  Department  has  tended  to  be  the  point  agency  in  these  cases. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Mr.  Banmiller,  did  you  share  your  concerns 

about predatory pricing with the DOT? 

Mr.  BANMILLER.  Yes,  I  did,  Chairman.  I  met  with  both  Secre-
taries  of  Transportation  on  this  issue  over  the  past  two  and  a  half 
years, and I met with lawyers from the Department of Justice. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

The CHAIRMAN. What was the reaction or response? 
Mr. BANMILLER. We will look into it, and that is all I heard. We 
followed  up  on  several  occasions  through  various  legislators,  and 
the comment back continued to be, including people from the DOT, 
well, predatory pricing is very hard to define and our interests are 
for the consumer and low fares. So I did not get very far. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Mr.  Secretary,  I  do  not  know  if  you  can  respond 
to this, but did you consider the report submitted by Aloha Airlines 
worthy of your consideration? 

Mr.  REYNOLDS.  We  were  familiar  with  the  allegations,  as  Mr. 
Banmiller  indicated.  He  met  with  officials  on  several  occasions. 
Further information or evidence I am not aware was ever provided 
to  the  Department.  I  was  not  in  the  conversations  that  he  had,  so 
I cannot speak to what went on exactly. 

In  this  particular  case,  there  is  litigation  going  on,  obviously,  of 
the  nature  of  the  claim  that  Aloha  is  pursuing  on  their  own.  So  I 
do not want to get into too many details. 

On its face, this is an issue that is very different from any other 
predatory  pricing  claim  that  we  have  ever  seen  before  because  in 
other  cases,  wherever  there  were  investigations,  it  was  a  new  en-
trant  coming  in  and  then  complaining  about  an  incumbent  carrier 
lowering  prices  and  dumping  capacity  and  trying  to  drive  the  new 
carrier  out,  where  in  this  case,  it  is  the  incumbent  that  has  the 
issue.  And  routinely  when  air  carriers  go  into  new  markets,  they 
offer  discounted  fares  in  order  to  attract  business.  So  at  least  ini-
tially,  it  did  not  have  a  look  of  the  traditional  cases  that  we  have 
seen in the past. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Because  one  of  the  reasons  for  bankruptcy,  as 
cited  by  Mr.  Banmiller,  was  predatory  pricing,  it  is  a  serious  mat-
ter.  Mr.  Secretary,  can  your  Department  provide  this  Committee 
with  a  report  on  the  complaint  submitted  by  Mr.  Banmiller  and 
your response to it? 

Mr. REYNOLDS. Yes, I can, Senator. 
The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 
In  the  years  I  have  been  on  this  Committee,  I  have  been  led  to 
believe  that  most  of  the  airlines  on  this  globe  are  either  fully  or 
partially  owned  by  the  host  governments.  The  ownership  interest 
may be 5 percent or it may be 100 percent, as in Saudi Arabia. 

What  is  the  situation  with  the  United  States?  Does  the  Govern-
ment of the United States have any ownership interest in any air-
lines other than the military? 

Mr.  REYNOLDS.  I  do  not  believe  so  except  perhaps  for  interests 
that  the  PBGC  might  actually  have  in  a  few  carriers.  I  know  they 
have  had  interests  in  the  assets  of  various  carriers.  But  the  Fed-
eral Government, other than when there were the loan guarantees 
following September 11, there were some warrants and other inter-
ests held in U.S. carriers which eventually were redeemed after the 
loans  were  repaid.  So  I  am  not  aware  of  any  active  investment  or 
interest on behalf of the Federal Government unless there is resid-
ual interest in something, for example, at the PBGC. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  If  that  is  the  situation,  is  there  a  level  playing 

field between international airlines and U.S. airlines? 

Mr. REYNOLDS. I think, for the most part, there are level playing 
fields in the most active markets. We always have the opportunity 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

to go after foreign air carriers if we feel that there are unfair com-
petitive practices, and if there is improper government involvement 
in a particular air carrier that is affecting service, our carriers are 
not  shy  about  bringing  those  sorts  of  issues  to  our  attention.  And 
we will usually go to the home governments of any of these carriers 
and  try  to  deal  with  these  situations.  I  am  not  familiar  with  any 
in the recent past having a major issue there, at least dealing with 
areas  where  the  U.S.  carrier  is  competing  with  the  foreign  carrier. 
A  lot  of  the  heaviest  competition  is  over  the  Atlantic.  Most  of 
those  carriers  are  privately  held,  for  the  most  part,  and  even  the 
EC  has  been  taking  steps  against  state  investment  and  involve-
ment in the carriers to reduce that as they compete amongst them-
selves. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Would  you  consider  that  the  load  placed  upon 
the operations costs by the Government of the United States is pro-
portionately  higher  than  what  other  governments  place  upon  their 
airlines? 

Mr.  REYNOLDS.  I  do  not  know  offhand  the  comparative  burdens 
of  different  governments.  I  imagine  it  probably  varies  widely.  I  do 
not know if Mr. May might even have any insight on that, but off-
hand I do not know. We would have to look into that. 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. May, do you think we have got a level play-

ing field here? 

Mr. MAY. No, sir, I do not. 
I  think  we  could  even  things  out,  but  a  lot  of  it  is  competitive 
in  its  marketplace.  One  of  the  areas  where  the  European  carriers 
have  a  distinct  advantage,  probably  as  much  as  30  percent  right 
now, is on fuel because they are paying for it in Euros. We are pay-
ing in dollars, and the dollar is significantly devalued. So they have 
got a real advantage there. 

I think that we are happy to compete internationally and will do 
well  internationally  in  most  areas.  I  acknowledge  that  there  are 
foreign government investments in some carriers around the world, 
some  very  extensive.  But  we  are  happy  to  compete  trans-Atlantic, 
trans-Pacific here in the United States. 

I think there is a lower burden imposed by governments in terms 
of  taxes  in  many  countries  than  there  are  here.  I  think  ours  are 
probably  as  great  as  anywhere  you  will  find  on  the  globe  in  terms 
of what carriers are paying. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 
What  role  does  the  Department  have  in  enforcement  when  you 

come across predatory pricing? 

Mr.  REYNOLDS.  As  I  mentioned  earlier,  we  will  take  complaints 
frequently—or not frequently. In the past, we have had complaints 
from carriers, and we have looked into the matter, as I mentioned. 
We will take the information, evidence that is provided by the car-
rier  that  feels  it  has  been  affected  by  the  behavior.  We  will  then 
frequently talk to the carrier that is accused of predation. And fre-
quently our involvement has had an effect in the past. 

Again, we have not actually had a formal predation claim in the 
last  decade,  and  even  informally  on  predation,  the  allegations  of 
Aloha  are  the  only  ones  we  have  had  in  the  last  10  years.  So  it  is 
not really a common occurrence at this time. I cannot speak to who 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

may  have  complained  to  Justice  about  behavior,  but  just  in  terms 
of what we do. 

Again,  we  share  enforcement  responsibilities  with  the  Depart-
ment of Justice, and we will work with them as they move forward 
on  cases.  In  fact,  they  have  only  brought  one  action,  and  that  was 
about 10 years ago. Maybe it was begun a little bit more than that 
against an airline. The Justice Department—a lot of people thought 
they  had  a  very  strong  case—was  not  able  to  prevail  in  court 
against  the  carrier  in  the  one  case  in  the  last  decade  and  a  half 
on predation. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  realize  that  you  have  not  been  made  fully 
aware  of  the  Aloha  Airlines  situation,  but  from  what  you  have 
heard at this hearing, would you consider the allegations worthy of 
study or investigation? Predatory pricing, that is. 

Mr. REYNOLDS. Well, we can look into it further. Again, I do not 
have all the information, and since there is a pending lawsuit, I too 
do not want to speculate on evidence that is not, frankly, before me 
or the Department at this point. So, again, I just would resist opin-
ing on something I do not really have full information on. 

Again,  we  will  provide  a  response  to  you  about  the  allegations 

that were brought to us by Aloha and can talk further on that. 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Willis, do you agree with Mr. Banmiller that 

there was predatory pricing in Hawaii? 

Mr.  WILLIS.  There  is  absolutely  no  question.  I  can  give  you  or 
your  staff  numerous  examples  of  it.  I  mean,  we  lost  almost  half  of 
our  traffic  through  what  Mesa  and  Go  had  done.  What  they  did  is 
they  diluted  and  diverted  our  traffic.  In  fact,  their  percentage  of 
the  marketplace  actually  came  mostly  from  our  traffic.  It  was  a 
combination of our traffic and Hawaiian and Aloha’s. 

One thing I just wanted to mention, if I may. Senator Smith had 
mentioned  his  concern  about  re-regulation.  One  thing  that  might 
be worthy of your consideration to provide some sort of a level play-
ing  field  in  the  stabilization  in  the  marketplace  would  be  some-
thing similar to what Aloha and Hawaiian did post-9/11, which was 
the  inter-island  cooperation  agreement.  Right  now,  we  need  sta-
bilization  in  those  markets.  Otherwise,  you  are  just  going  to  see  a 
monopoly condition present itself. That is number one. 

The  second  thing  is  what  you  had  mentioned  to  Mr.  Fukunaga 
about  SB–509  because  I  got  the  impression  that  they  may  not  be 
able  to  support  that  bill.  Right  now,  lending  to  airlines  is  closed. 
That  is  why  that  bill  is  very,  very  important  for  the  existing  car-
riers in Hawaii to have access to the capital markets. 

I  apologize  for  getting  off  subject,  but  it  is  kind  of  important  to 

address that. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  And  30  years  ago,  when  this  committee  consid-
ered  airline  deregulation,  after  long  and  lengthy  hearings  and  de-
bates, we took a vote. It was almost unanimous. One vote against. 
I  was  the  one  against.  When  the  vote  was  announced,  you  can 
imagine  the  controversy.  You  know,  I  felt  like  an  outsider  all  by 
myself. 

But my concern was that the change was too sudden in deregula-
tion of scheduling and costs, and I suggested to some of my friends 
in  other  states  that  if  this  ever  goes  through,  you  may  be  losing 
business  in  your  state.  I  recall  a  little  city  called  Charlestown  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

West  Virginia  that  at  one  time  was  receiving  nine  flights  a  day, 
and suddenly almost overnight, they got none. 

I cannot tell you whether I did right or wrong, but I think some-
thing  has  to  be  done,  not  to  re-regulate  but  maybe  we  should  re-
visit that. 

Mr.  May,  you  were  speaking  of  a  couple  of  things  that  we  can 

do. Can you just reemphasize it again? 

Mr.  MAY.  Yes,  sir,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  think  the  idea  of  filling  the 
Strategic  Petroleum  Reserve  at  today’s  prices  borders  on  criminal 
infringement of the rules of economics. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Has  your  organization  formally  indicated  your 

concern to the Government of the United States? 

Mr. MAY. We have not recently done that. I did it during the last 
dust-up  over  fuel  prices,  and  we  asked  for  both  the  release  and  to 
stop  filling  at  current  prices  then,  which  were  probably  about  70 
bucks a barrel. And we were rejected. 

Within  the  last  3  weeks  to  4  weeks,  I  sent  a  letter  to  Secretary 
Bodman asking for a release from the Northeast Home Heating Oil 
Reserve, and I have not received a response from him on that. 

But  we  got  together  with  our  energy  committee  within  the  last 
few  days,  kicked  around  a  series  of  ideas,  some  of  which  are  not 
quite  ready  for  prime  time,  but  I  would  be  happy  to  provide  them 
to  the  Committee.  One  of  the  ideas  that  we  came  up  with  is  our 
concern  that  there  is  a  premium  involved  in  the  price  of  a  barrel 
of oil today as a result of speculation. There are a lot of exchanges 
operating  out  there,  ISE  down  in  Atlanta  and  elsewhere.  A  lot  of 
people  making  a  whole  lot  of  money  on  the  price  of  oil  right  now. 
If  the  U.S.  Government  would  exercise  a  whip  hand  and  release 
from  the  SPR,  increasing  supply,  arguably  driving  prices,  they 
would  not  be  able  to  act  with  such  impunity  thinking  that  nobody 
is going to have any impact on pricing. 

So  we  think  a  10  million  barrel  release  would  have  a  dramatic 
effect  and  would  send  a  signal.  We  would  not  want  it  announced 
in advance. We would like it just to happen. Every now and again, 
if  you  release  some  of  that  oil,  that  will  keep  everybody  on  their 
toes,  and  I  think  we  would  have  a  more  meaningful  marketplace 
reflection on price. So those are two ideas. 

The third idea is a balanced funding formula and FAA reauthor-

ization, not a new subject to this Committee. 

And the final idea was to try and encourage that we get the next 
generation air traffic control systems in place as quickly as we can. 
2025  is  not  going  to  do  it.  We  have  adopted  the  phrase  suggested 
by  others.  The  ‘‘now  generation’’  as  opposed  to  next  generation  is 
what  we  need  because  the  more  efficiently  we  can  fly  point-to- 
point,  the  more  efficiently  we  can  route  our  aircraft  into  crowded 
airports  and  out  of  crowded  airspace,  the  less  fuel  we  are  going  to 
be  able  to  burn  and  the  more  efficiently  we  can  conduct  our  oper-
ations. 

So  those  were  the  four  things  that  I  recommended  to  the  Com-

The  CHAIRMAN.  From  what  I  gather,  you  consider  these  matters 

to be urgent and should be acted upon right away. 

Mr. MAY. Mr. Chairman, I think without question. We have had 
five carriers, including Aloha, go bankrupt since Christmas. I think 

mittee. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

there  are  others  that  are  very  much  on  the  edge.  There  is  no  sign 
whatsoever  that  fuel  prices  are  coming  down  anytime  soon.  Most 
of  the  business  plans  for  our  carriers  were  built  on  a  projection  of 
probably  $85  oil,  maybe  $90  oil  in  some  instances,  and  when  you 
look at the impact of the crack spread on top of the price of a bar-
rel,  135  bucks  on  average  is  what  we  are  paying  right  now.  And 
that is just unsustainable. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Mr. Snowbarger, your agency is an important one for employees. 
You  speak  of  pension  guarantees.  In  making  plans  for  the  future, 
do  you  anticipate  more  bankruptcies,  layoffs,  and  pension  guar-
antee problems? Is there going to be an increase or decrease? 

Mr. SNOWBARGER. There will be an increase in bankruptcies. We 
have  seen  a  number  in  industry,  for  instance,  that  have  gone 
through bankruptcy once that may very well come back like Aloha 
for  a  second  bankruptcy,  and  maybe  they  were  able  to  keep  their 
pension  plans  the  first  time  through,  maybe  not  the  second  time 
through. I think with the credit markets the way they are, with the 
economy the way it is at this point, I think we are going to see an 
increase over the next few years. 

We  are  sort  of  a  lagging  indicator  of  the  economy.  We  normally 
have  an  up-tick  in  the  number  of  plans  that  we  take  on  maybe  2 
or  3  years  after  the  worst  of  the  economic  cycle.  So  that  may  not 
hit  us  this  year  or  next  year,  but  maybe  late  next  year,  a  couple 
years down the road. 

And  it  also  depends  on  sort  of  the  cycles  within  each  industry. 
Again,  we  probably  will  not  take  over  many  more  steel  plans  be-
cause there are not many more steel plans left. We have taken over 
a considerable number of the pension plans in the airline industry, 
although there are still more out there that do cause us some con-
cern. 

I  think  that  is  the  reason  Congress  provided  for  extended  pay-
ment  of  their  contributions  in  the  Pension  Protection  Act  that  was 
passed  in  2006.  But  I  think  anytime  you  see  a  troubled  industry, 
it is very possible that we will be taking over plans. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  When  you  speak  of  increases  in  bankruptcies, 

does that apply to the airline industry also? 

Mr. SNOWBARGER. Well, I think it is difficult for me to predict ex-
actly what is going to happen in the industry. I think these gentle-
men  have  given  you  pretty  dire  forecasts  about  what  they  are  fac-
ing.  I  am  not  an  expert  on  what  they  are  facing,  but  fuel  costs 
alone—I  understand  that.  I  am  paying  more  at  the  pump,  and  I 
can  imagine  if  that  is  45  percent  of  their  costs  and  the  prices  are 
not going down, that it will be difficult. I cannot tell you how they 
might react to that. It is possible that through combinations of air-
lines  or  something  of  that  nature,  there  are  economies  that  would 
allow them to continue in business. Like I say, I do not know that 
I am expert enough to predict what might happen. 

But there are airline companies out there that have sizable pen-
sion  plans.  The  pension  plans  that  we  have  taken  over  in  the  last 
few  years,  particularly  from  United,  to  a  lesser  extent  Delta  Air-
lines  in  their  pilots’  plan,  are  some  of  the  largest  claims  that  have 
ever come to the agency. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you, sir. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

Mr.  Secretary,  do  you  agree  that  this  matter  of  deregulation 

should be revisited? 

Mr.  REYNOLDS.  I  think  the  Administration  supports  the  current 
deregulated  environment.  We  know  that  there  have  been  commu-
nities have have fared better than others under deregulation in the 
airline  industry,  but  as  Mr.  Banmiller  said,  I  do  not  think  you 
could  put  the  toothpaste  back  in  the  tube  even  if  you  wanted  to. 
And I do not know that the Administration would support any form 
of economic re-regulation of the industry at this point. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  This  has  been  a  long  day,  gentlemen,  and  I 
thank you for your patience. But as you can imagine, this is a very 
important  matter  for  the  people  of  Hawaii.  And  I  thank  you  for 
your  presence  here  and  your  testimony.  It  has  been  very  helpful. 
If  you  do  have  amendments  that  you  would  like  to  submit, 
changes  in  your  testimony,  or  if  you  have  any  added  words  you 
would  like  to  place  in  the  record,  please  feel  free  to  do  so.  The 
record will be kept open for 3 weeks. 

So thank you very much. The hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 5:34 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

I  am  pleased  to  join  my  good  friend  from  Hawaii  at  this  hearing  today  to  look 
at the aviation challenges his state faces. Our states are very similar since they are 
so heavily dependent on aviation. 

When  Aloha  went  out  of  business,  it  was  not  like  Independence  Air  going  out  of 
business.  In  our  states,  airlines  are  the  backbone  of  our  economies.  The  effect  on 
Hawaii  of  Aloha  going  out  of  business  is  a  lot  more  like  the  Metro  system  shutting 
down in Washington D.C., than it is of just an airline going bust. 

Aloha provided 80,000 seats of service a week. That’s 80,000 people who now can’t 
go  to  their  doctors,  visit  their  family,  get  to  their  jobs,  or  conduct  business.  There 
really  is  no  other  practical  or  economical  way  of  moving  between  the  islands  other 
than through the air. 

In  addition  to  Aloha  shutting  down,  ATA  airlines  ceased  operations.  ATA  carried 
15 percent of visitors to Hawaii. Without ATA in the market, it is likely that there 
will  be  fewer  visitors  and  prices  will  rise.  This  will  no  doubt  have  a  serious  impact 
on Hawaii’s economy which is so dependent on tourism. 

The Committee is very interested to hear more about this situation and what we 
can do to prevent it from happening in the future. As we all know, the airline indus-
try  is  facing  some  really  tough  financial  times  because  of  the  price  of  oil.  We  have 
already  seen  five  airlines—Aloha,  MAXjet,  Skybus,  ATA  and  Champion  shut  down. 
We  need  to  figure  out  how  best  to  help  Hawaii  and  how  to  ensure  that  we  don’t 
have  even  more  bankruptcies.  We  are  especially  interested  to  hear  from  the  U.S. 
Department  of  Transportation  witness  about  what  the  Department  can  do  in  this 
area. 

Finally,  I  think  we  need  to  carefully  watch  how  high  fuel  costs  will  affect  other 
transportation  sectors  such  as  the  trucking  and  railroad  industries—and  even  the 
fishing industry which is an intense user of fuel. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

MICHAEL W. REYNOLDS 

Question  1.  Does  the  DOT  monitor  the  U.S.  aviation  market  for  potential  cases 

of predatory pricing? 

Question  2.  Can  you  tell  me  how  many  examples  of  predatory  pricing  have  been 

uncovered over the past decade? 

Question  3.  What  role  does  the  DOT  have  in  the  enforcement  of  such  predatory 

pricing cases? 

Question 4. Can you provide us any insight into the Administration’s views on the 

allegations of predatory pricing in the Hawaii market? 

Question 5. Do the Hawaii communities who are eligible for the EAS program, but 
do not receive EAS funding, have air service comparable to what they would receive 
under the EAS program in terms of the number of flights per day and destinations? 
Question 6. If the air service now provided to Kalaupapa is not comparable to the 
service provided under the EAS program, is it possible for the community to return 
to the EAS program? If it is not, why not? 

Question  7.  What  steps  can  Kalaupapa  take  to  be  placed  in  the  EAS  program? 
Answer  1–4.  During  my  recent  testimony  before  the  Senate  Committee  on  Com-
merce,  Science,  and  Transportation  on  the  subject  of  Hawaiian  air  service,  you  re-
quested  that  I  provide  a  report  on  the  Department  of  Transportation’s  handling  of 
allegations  that  go!,  which  is  operated  by  Mesa  Airlines  (Mesa),  might  be  engaging 
in predatory pricing. 

While  the  Department  was  aware  that  go!  had  entered  the  inter-island  markets 
with  very  low  fares,  this  strategy  on  the  part  of  a  new  entrant  carrier  seeking  to 
develop  an  initial  market  presence  is  not  uncommon.  Aloha’s  President  and  Chief 

(49) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

Executive  Officer,  David  A.  Banmiller,  had  also  expressed  concerns  to  Department 
officials  that  go!’s  pricing  policies  were  largely  meant  to  drive  established  carriers 
like Aloha from the inter-island markets. However, the Department was never pre-
sented  with  a  factual  basis  to  support  allegations  that  go!’s  activities  constituted 
predatory  conduct.  Also,  neither  Aloha  nor  any  other  carrier  has  filed  a  formal  en-
forcement complaint seeking an investigation. As was discussed at the hearing, both 
Aloha  and  Hawaiian  Airlines  have  chosen  to  undertake  private  rights  of  action  in 
the courts alleging misuse by go! of proprietary information, as well as, in the case 
of  Aloha  Airlines,  engaging  in  predatory  pricing.  We  understand  that  Hawaiian  re-
cently settled its case against Mesa for $52.5 million. 

Normally  the  Department  of  Justice’s  (DOJ’s)  Antitrust  Division  takes  the  lead 
role  in  prosecuting  cases  of  alleged  predation  in  the  airline  industry,  and  when  the 
Department  of  Transportation  is  presented  with  evidence  that  a  carrier’s  pricing 
policies  might  constitute  predatory  behavior,  we  share  that  information  with  the 
Antitrust  Division.  However,  as  I  am  sure  you  are  aware,  predation  claims  have 
proven  particularly  difficult  to  sustain  in  the  courts  in  recent  years.  Moreover,  vir-
tually  all  predation  concerns  that  carriers  brought  to  the  Department  in  the  past 
concerned  the  impact  of  large  incumbent  airlines’  pricing  on  new  entrants.  A  suc-
cessful  challenge  by  the  Federal  Government  against  the  pricing  activity  of  a  new 
entrant such as go!, based on its potential harm to a long-established incumbent in 
the Hawaiian inter-island markets, would clearly require extensive supporting docu-
mentary  evidence  that  in  large  measure  the  carriers  alleging  the  competitive  harm 
would have to provide. 

It is important to keep the allegations in this case in the proper context. As I tes-
tified,  the  Department  has  not  received  any  formal  complaints  of  predatory  pricing 
over  the  past  decade.  We  did,  however,  receive  several  informal  complaints  about 
predatory  conduct  in  the  mid-1990s.  In  each  instance,  a  new  entrant  carrier  con-
tacted DOT and provided substantial evidence in support of its allegations. 

The characteristics of the Aloha-go! situation, as far as we have been made aware, 
are  unique.  First,  it  was  the  incumbent  carrier,  Aloha,  which  operated  larger  air-
craft and more capacity in the market, alleging that a new entrant engaged in pred-
atory  pricing.  Second,  Aloha  has  alleged  that  Mesa  obtained  confidential,  competi-
tively sensitive information as a prospective investor and subsequently used this in-
formation in launching go!. 

Furthermore, DOJ has had difficulty in proving predatory pricing under the anti-
trust  laws.  Low  prices,  which  new  entrants  typically  offer  when  they  enter  a  mar-
ket, are not in and of themselves evidence of predatory behavior. Several years ago, 
DOJ  brought  suit  against  American  Airlines  for  alleged  predatory  pricing  and  lost. 
The  unique  characteristics  of  the  situation  in  Hawaii  suggest  that  an  important, 
and  possibly  differentiating,  component  is  whether  confidentially  obtained  propri-
etary information was used illegally or improperly to launch go!’s inter-island oper-
ations. Adjudicating such allegations is better left to private actions brought by the 
parties that believe they have been harmed. 

DOT’s  statutory  policies  encourage  us  to  oversee  the  airline  industry  in  such  a 
way as to encourage competition and low fares. Airline deregulation proves that new 
business  models,  especially  low-cost  carriers,  are  critical  to  ensuring  that  the  bene-
fits  of  deregulation  are  passed  through  to  consumers  in  all  sectors  of  the  economy 
dependent  on  efficient  air  transportation.  The  usual  challenge  for  government  is  to 
exercise economic oversight of the industry to promote vigorous competition. There-
fore, in the past, our focus has been on structural economic issues that were largely 
unanticipated at the time of deregulation. 

Nonetheless,  based  upon  the  testimony  that  was  provided  to  the  Aviation  Sub-
committee,  we  will  ensure  that  our  colleagues  in  the  Antitrust  Division  are  aware 
of  the  concerns  that  have  been  expressed  by  Mr.  Banmiller  and  others  with  go!’s 
inter-island market pricing policies. 

I  can  assure  you  that  we  are  keenly  aware  of  the  unique  role  that  air  transpor-
tation  plays  in  the  State  of  Hawaii  and  that  the  status  of  air  transportation  both 
to  and  within  Hawaii  continues  to  be  an  important  issue  to  the  Department  of 
Transportation,  particularly  in  light  of  the  recent  cessation  of  passenger  service  by 
Aloha Airlines. The Department will continue to monitor air services in Hawaii, and 
will maintain its efforts to promote and sustain competition in Hawaii and through-
out the United States. 

If I can provide further information or assistance, please feel free to call me. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:07 Jul 03, 2012 Jkt 074892 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\74892.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

